Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 1: Henry Corbin — Avicenna and the Visionary Recital
1. Source identity

Primary source: Henry Corbin, Avicenna and the Visionary Recital, translated by Willard R. Trask, Bollingen Series LXVI, Pantheon Books, 1960. Google Books lists it as 423 pages, published by Pantheon in 1960.

Public access status: A full text is visible on Internet Archive and scanned PDFs circulate online, but the work is explicitly copyrighted 1960 by the Bollingen Foundation.

Use cautious quotation. For Imaginarium, this should be treated mainly as a summation / structural extraction source, not a quote-heavy source.

Text type: Corbinian philosophical commentary + translation + symbolic exegesis.

Extraction mode:
Use extensive summation, chapter mapping, conceptual extraction, and short legally safe excerpts only. The blueprints can cite public previews, tables of contents, and public text locations, but should not import long passages.

2. Why this source comes first

This is the best first post-Corbin source because it bridges:

Corbin → Avicenna → Suhrawardī → Ibn ʿArabī / ʿAṭṭār

It gives the project a precise grammar for the visionary recital: not fantasy, not metaphor only, but a symbolic drama where the soul encounters its angelic guide and learns to read the cosmos as a map of its own exile and return.

The central Imaginarium value is this:

The world becomes readable as a symbolic geography only when the soul meets the Guide.

The source is especially useful for:

Imaginarium theme	What this source gives
Mundus imaginalis	Pre-Corbinian roots of imaginal geography
Daimon / angel	The personal Angel, Active Intelligence, guide
Taʾwīl	Exegesis of the soul, not just text interpretation
Visionary journey	Orient / Occident, exile, return, ascent
Inner cosmology	Spheres, angels, demons, subtle companions
Narrative engine	Recital as initiatory form
3. Master structural reading

The book has two major movements:

Part I — The Cycle of Avicennan Recitals

This is Corbin’s interpretive engine. It explains why Avicenna’s symbolic tales should be read together as a coherent cycle: Hayy ibn Yaqẓān, The Recital of the Bird, and Salāmān and Absāl.

Google Books and Archive tables of contents show the major sections: “Avicennan Cosmos and Visionary Recital,” “Avicennism and Angelology,” “The Recital of Hayy ibn Yaqẓān,” “The Recital of the Bird,” “From Avicenna’s Recital to ʿAṭṭār’s Mystical Epic,” and “The Recital of Salāmān and Absāl.”

Part II — Translation of the Persian Commentary on Hayy ibn Yaqẓān

This is the practical symbolic map: Angel, companions, Orient, Occident, Spring of Life, darkness around the Pole, celestial spheres, demons of the soul, terrestrial angels, King, and final invitation.

4. Part / chapter function map
Part I: The Cycle of Avicennan Recitals
Section	Function for blueprint
Avicennan Cosmos and Visionary Recital	Establishes symbolic cosmology: the world is not inert space but a crypt needing exegesis.
Taʾwīl as Exegesis of the Soul	Key section. Use for essay on interpretation as inner transformation.
Journey into the Orient	The Orient is not geographical East but the direction of spiritual origin.
Avicennism and Angelology	Angelology engine: Active Intelligence, personal Angel, celestial souls, archangelic hierarchy.
Hayy ibn Yaqẓān	The encounter with the Angel-guide.
Recital of the Bird	The soul as captive bird, ascent, Mount Qāf, return with the King’s Messenger.
From Avicenna to ʿAṭṭār	Bridge to Conference of the Birds. Essential cross-source connector.
Salāmān and Absāl	Soul drama, intellective powers, angelicity, mystical death / return without return.
Avicennism and Imāmism	Later Corbinian bridge into Shiʿi angelology and esoteric interpretation.
Symbolism and Presence	Important for Imaginarium: symbol is not decorative; it mediates presence.
5. Part II: Persian commentary function map
Commentary section	Use
Prologue	Frame of visionary entry.
Encounter with the Angel	Core daimon/guide passage-pack.
The Salutation	Recognition scene: how the soul addresses the Guide.
Name and Person of the Angel	Hayy ibn Yaqẓān as “Living, son of Awake/Vigilant.”
Physiognomy	The Angel’s appearance as symbolic body.
Two Ways for the Soul	Branching destiny: descent or return.
Soul’s Three Evil Companions	Psychological engine: hostile attachments/personified lower faculties.
Conditions of the Journey	Practice and purification requirements.
Orient and Occident of the Universe	Core imaginal geography.
Spring of Life	Regeneration motif.
Darkness about the Pole	Strange imaginal geography; preserve this.
Occident of the World	Exile, matter, distance from origin.
Terrestrial / Celestial Matter	Important for subtle-body cosmology.
Celestial Spheres	Cosmological ascent.
Kingdom of the Soul	Interior world as kingdom.
Demons / Genii / Terrestrial Angels	Differentiated imaginal population, not generic “inner forces.”
Beauty of the King	Theophanic culmination.
Those Who Emigrate Toward the Kingdom	The soul as emigrant.
“If Thou Wilt, Follow Me”	Final invitation; bridge to Suhrawardī’s Occidental Exile.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Angel as Daimon / Guide

Core idea: the soul cannot orient itself alone. It needs the Angel, which is both cosmic Intelligence and intimate personal guide.

Use for:

daimon engine
personal genius
vocation
higher intelligence
Active Intelligence as inner teacher
Cluster B — Taʾwīl as Soul-Exegesis

Corbin says the visionary recital exemplifies taʾwīl as not merely textual interpretation but exegesis of the soul.

Use for:

Imaginarium reading method
symbolic literacy
“world as text”
interpretation as transformation
Cluster C — Orient and Occident

The Orient is origin, light, angelic source.
The Occident is exile, matter, forgetfulness, distance.

This becomes one of the project’s strongest metaphysical maps.

Cluster D — The Bird-Soul

The bird is the soul trapped in nets, awakened, ascending, but not finally freed.

Use for:

ʿAṭṭār bridge
captivity / ascent
partial liberation
return with the Messenger
Cluster E — Subtle Cosmology

Spheres, celestial souls, archangelic intellects, terrestrial angels, demons of the soul, genii of the soul.

This gives the “population” of the imaginal world.

Cluster F — The Three Companions

Extremely useful for psychological rendering theory: the soul travels with hostile or ambiguous companions that must be handled rather than merely destroyed.

Cluster G — Salāmān and Absāl

Use as a later essay, not first. It is harder, fragmentary, and partly reconstructed. But it gives a powerful model of the divided soul, angelicity, mystical death, and “journey without return.”

7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Angel Who Teaches the Soul to Read”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Sections: Hayy ibn Yaqẓān; Angel; Active Intelligence; personal guide.
Function: Establish the daimonic / angelic guide as the first Imaginarium engine.

Essay 2 — “Taʾwīl: Exegesis of the Soul”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Sections: Avicennan Cosmos; Cosmic Crypt; Taʾwīl as Exegesis of the Soul.
Function: Define how Imaginarium should read sources: symbol as operational transformation.

Essay 3 — “Orient and Occident of the Soul”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Sections: Orient / Occident; Spring of Life; Darkness about the Pole; Occident of the World.
Function: Build the imaginal geography map.

Essay 4 — “The Bird in the Net”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Sections: Recital of the Bird; Bird as Symbol; Mount Qāf; King’s Messenger.
Function: Soul-captivity, awakening, ascent, partial return.

Essay 5 — “The Three Evil Companions”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Sections: Soul’s three evil companions; how to treat them; demons/genii of the soul.
Function: Practical psychological map: faculties as companions, not abstractions.

Essay 6 — “Angelic Pedagogy and Individuation”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Sections: Avicennism and Angelology; Angelic Pedagogy and Individuation.
Function: Link Avicenna to Jung/Corbin/Imaginarium individuation without flattening it into psychology.

Essay 7 — “From Avicenna’s Bird to ʿAṭṭār’s Birds”

Target: 2,500–3,000 words
Sections: From Avicenna’s Recital to ʿAṭṭār’s Mystical Epic.
Function: Bridge directly to source 4 in the queue.

Essay 8 — “Salāmān and Absāl: The Soul’s Angelic Pair”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Sections: Salāmān and Absāl; Hermetic version; Avicennan version.
Function: Advanced essay after the core architecture is built.

8. Passage-pack targets

Do not quote heavily. Build packs around locations.

Pack	Source location	Use
Angel Encounter Pack	Part II: Prologue; Encounter with the Angel; Salutation; Name and Person	Daimon / guide essay
Taʾwīl Pack	Part I: Cosmic Crypt; Taʾwīl as Exegesis of the Soul	Reading-method essay
Orient Pack	Part II: Orient and Occident; Spring of Life; Darkness about the Pole; Occident	Imaginal geography
Companions Pack	Part II: Three Evil Companions; How to Treat the Three Companions	Psychological rendering
Bird Pack	Part I: Recital of the Bird; Bird as Symbol; Translation of the Bird	Soul-captivity and ascent
Angelology Pack	Part I: Angel, Spirit and Intelligence; Archangels-Cherubs; Celestial Angels; Angelic Pedagogy	Metaphysical architecture
Salāmān Pack	Part I: Two Versions; Hermetic Version; Avicennan Version	Advanced soul-drama
Bridge Pack	From Avicenna to ʿAṭṭār; final invitation “follow me”	Next-source transition
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Angel / daimon	5/5	One of the strongest sources in the whole queue.
Imaginal geography	5/5	Orient, Occident, Pole, Spring of Life, celestial spheres.
Taʾwīl	5/5	Crucial methodological source.
Poetic narrative	3/5	Present, but less lush than Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār.
Practical mysticism	3/5	Implied through journey conditions; less direct than Kubrā.
Metaphysics	4/5	Strong angelology and cosmology, but not as complete as Ibn ʿArabī.
Symbolic psychology	5/5	Three companions, demons/genii, soul kingdom.
Theophany	3/5	Present in King/Beauty motifs; stronger later in Ibn ʿArabī/Rūzbihān.
Source accessibility	3/5	Publicly visible, but copyright caution required.
Essay usefulness	5/5	Extremely high signal for Imaginarium.
10. Cut / merge / split decisions
Split

Split Angel / Daimon from Angelology.

Angel / Daimon = experiential guide.
Angelology = metaphysical hierarchy.

Do not merge them or the essay becomes too abstract.

Split

Split Orient / Occident from Bird-Soul.

Orient / Occident = cosmological map.
Bird-Soul = narrative journey through that map.
Merge

Merge Demons of the Soul, Genii of the Soul, and Three Evil Companions into one practical essay cluster.

Delay

Delay Salāmān and Absāl until after the reader understands Hayy and the Bird. It is too obscure as an opening source.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

Spring of Life
Darkness about the Pole
Mount Qāf
King’s Messenger
Three Evil Companions
Terrestrial angels
“If thou wilt, follow me”

These are the details that stop the project becoming generic mysticism.

11. Overlap warnings
With Corbin’s Mundus Imaginalis

Overlap: imaginal world, symbolic cognition, spiritual geography.
Difference: Avicenna and the Visionary Recital is more narrative, angelic, and initiatory.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: Orient, exile, angelic guide, illumination.
Difference: Avicenna gives the seed-form; Suhrawardī radicalizes it into full illuminationist metaphysics.

With ʿAṭṭār

Overlap: bird-soul, journey, collective ascent.
Difference: Avicenna’s bird is philosophical and cosmic; ʿAṭṭār’s birds are poetic, ethical, and communal.

With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: imagination, angelology, divine manifestation.
Difference: Avicenna is more hierarchical and emanationist; Ibn ʿArabī is more theophanic and nondual.

12. Missing / weak coverage

This source does not fully cover:

Missing area	Better later source
Ecstatic divine love	Rūzbihān Baqlī
Full theophanic metaphysics	Ibn ʿArabī, Fuṣūṣ
Practical dhikr / light perception	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
Poetic parable engine	Rūmī
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
Collective initiatory journey	ʿAṭṭār
Compact symbolic metaphysics	Shabistarī
13. Final recommended blueprint sequence

For this source, produce companion material in this order:

Source architecture map
Angel / daimon guide essay
Taʾwīl as soul-exegesis essay
Orient / Occident geography essay
Bird-soul ascent essay
Three companions / demons / genii essay
Angelic pedagogy and individuation essay
Avicenna → Suhrawardī bridge note
Avicenna → ʿAṭṭār bridge note
Salāmān and Absāl advanced essay
14. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Angel Encounter

Use first. This becomes the daimonic core.

Sections:
Part II: Prologue; Encounter with the Angel; Salutation; Name and Person of the Angel; Physiognomy.

Pack 2 — Taʾwīl and Cosmic Crypt

Use second. This defines the reading method.

Sections:
Part I: Avicennan Cosmos; Cosmic Crypt; Taʾwīl as Exegesis of the Soul.

Pack 3 — Orient / Occident

Use third. This builds the imaginal map.

Sections:
Part II: Orient and Occident; Spring of Life; Darkness about the Pole; Occident of the World; Celestial Spheres.

Pack 4 — Bird-Soul

Use fourth. This becomes the transition into ʿAṭṭār.

Sections:
Part I: Recital of the Bird; Bird as Symbol; Translation of the Recital of the Bird; From Avicenna to ʿAṭṭār.

Pack 5 — Three Companions

Use fifth. This is the psychological/practical Imaginarium essay.

Sections:
Part II: Soul’s Three Evil Companions; How to Treat the Three Companions; Demons of the Soul; Genii of the Soul.

15. Final verdict

This is the correct first source after Corbin’s already-completed pieces.

It gives Imaginarium a strong root-engine:

the soul is exiled in the Occident of matter; the world is a crypt; taʾwīl unlocks the crypt by interpreting the soul; the Angel appears as guide; the soul becomes bird, emigrant, companion, and traveler; the journey turns toward the Orient, but final liberation remains suspended as invitation.

Use this source not for mass quotation, but for architecture.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 2: Suhrawardī — The Philosophy of Illumination, Hayākil al-Nūr, and the Visionary Recitals
1. Source identity

Primary figure: Shihāb al-Dīn Yaḥyā al-Suhrawardī, 1154–1191, founder of the Illuminationist / Ishrāqī tradition. SEP describes him as trained in Avicennan Peripateticism but later the major founder of an Illuminationist philosophical tradition in the Islamic East.

Core source cluster:

Ḥikmat al-Ishrāq / The Philosophy of Illumination
Best scholarly English edition: John Walbridge and Hossein Ziai, BYU Press, 1999/2000. It is copyrighted, so use mainly structure, short excerpts, and summation. PhilArchive lists the edition details.

Hayākil al-Nūr / The Temples or Shape of Light
Public scans exist, including The Shape of Light, but the Archive copy explicitly says ©1998 Tosun Bayrak / Fons Vitae, all rights reserved.

Use sparingly. A public PDF also circulates through Traditional Hikma.

Persian visionary recitals:
Especially The Red Intellect, The Chant of Gabriel’s Wing, The Treatise of the Birds, A Day Among the Sufis, and On the State of Childhood. Mehdi Amin Razavi’s public text lists these works and provides a useful map of Suhrawardī’s corpus.

Text type: Illuminationist metaphysics + symbolic visionary narrative + angelology + epistemology of direct presence.

Extraction mode:
Mostly extensive summation and architecture, not quote-heavy reproduction. Use public-access versions for structure and limited excerpts, but treat most translations as copyrighted.

2. Why this source comes second

Avicenna gave the Angel-guide and the visionary recital. Suhrawardī takes that seed and turns it into a full metaphysics of light, presence, Orient, exile, and imaginal ascent.

The transition is:

Avicenna: the soul meets the Angel and learns the map.
Suhrawardī: the whole of reality becomes a hierarchy of lights, shadows, presences, and degrees of awakening.

This is the source where “light” becomes ontological. Not metaphor, not decoration: light is the structure of being, knowing, selfhood, and spiritual rank. SEP states that in The Philosophy of Illumination, Suhrawardī develops a metaphysics of divine lights, with light as the central principle structuring ontology and cosmology.

3. Master structural reading

Suhrawardī should not be treated as “a mystic who liked light imagery.” He is building a new mode of knowing.

His system has three linked layers:

Layer 1 — Ontology of light

Reality is graded by light and darkness. The highest principle is the Light of Lights; lower beings are degrees of illumination, shadow, dependence, and orientation. A public summary notes that Suhrawardī teaches an emanationist cosmology where creation flows from the Supreme Light of Lights.

Layer 2 — Knowledge by presence

Knowledge is not only definition, syllogism, or representation. Suhrawardī’s key epistemological move is presential knowledge: direct self-disclosure, knowing by being present to what is known. SEP describes his epistemology as revolving around ḥuḍūrī / presential knowledge, accessed through intuitive apprehension or contemplative vision.

Layer 3 — Visionary recital

The philosophical system is mirrored by symbolic stories: Red Intellect, Gabriel’s Wing, birds, exile, childhood, mountains, cosmic beings. These are not “examples” after the philosophy; they are the imaginal mode of the same doctrine.

4. Part / work map
A. The Philosophy of Illumination
Component	Function
Critique of Peripatetic method	Shows why discursive philosophy alone is insufficient.
Logic / method sections	Prepares the reader to move beyond definition into seeing.
Light ontology	Core metaphysics: Light of Lights, immaterial lights, governing lights, dependent lights.
Darkness / barriers / bodies	Explains matter and opacity without making matter evil in a crude dualism.
Knowledge by presence	Key epistemological engine for Imaginarium.
Angelic / celestial hierarchy	Gives the vertical architecture of the imaginal cosmos.
Sagehood / illumination	Philosophy becomes realized vision, not merely doctrine.
B. Hayākil al-Nūr / Temples of Light
Component	Function
Human soul	Defines the soul as more than body and sense.
Sense limitation	Shows why ordinary perception is a narrowed rendering.
Levels of mind / spirit	Useful for subtle-body and cognition mapping.
Firmaments / realms	Bridge between cosmology and inner ascent.
Pleasure and pain	Links metaphysics to lived experience.
Light hymn / divine praise	Establishes devotional tone of illumination.
PhilPapers summarizes The Shape of Light as treating the levels of the human soul, sense limitations, theomorphic essence, realms or centers, firmaments, and pleasure/pain.
C. Visionary recitals
Recital	Function
The Red Intellect	Old sage / red intelligence / cosmic riddling / initiatory dialogue.
The Chant of Gabriel’s Wing	Angelic mediation, wing-symbolism, revelation as vibration or chant.
Treatise of the Birds	Avicennan bridge; bird-soul motif intensified.
A Day Among the Sufis	Community of realized perception; experiential setting.
On the State of Childhood	Return to primordial perception, pre-habitual seeing.
Occidental Exile if included	Exile from the Orient; strongest bridge from Avicenna’s Orient/Occident map.
5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Source area	Imaginarium use
Light of Lights	Absolute source; not abstract God-concept but overflowing luminosity.
Immaterial lights	Angelic intelligences / vertical degrees of being.
Governing lights	Forms of cosmic administration; useful for daimonic order.
Darkness	Not simple evil; opacity, distance, dependence, obstruction.
Barzakh / intermediary	Key imaginal category: between pure light and dense body.
Presential knowledge	Foundation for non-representational gnosis.
Vision / mushāhada	Practice-linked seeing; not fantasy.
Dream of Aristotle	Authority shift from discursive Aristotelianism to illumination. PhilPapers notes the dream of Aristotle in connection with Suhrawardī’s rejection of the Avicennan Peripatetic philosophy of his youth.
Red Intellect	Symbolic intelligence appearing as a figure.
Gabriel’s Wing	Angelic transmission, sound/light/revelation cluster.
Birds	Soul’s captivity, ascent, return.
Childhood	Original perception before conceptual hardening.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Light as Being

This is the central essay cluster. Light is not “a symbol for truth”; rather, truth is a mode of luminosity. Being reveals itself by shining. Darkness is not a rival substance but the degree of non-disclosure, obstruction, or distance from source.

Cluster B — Knowledge by Presence

This is the most important philosophical contribution for the Imaginarium system.

Ordinary knowing: concept, representation, definition.
Illuminationist knowing: presence, disclosure, immediate awareness.

This connects directly to active imagination, visionary cognition, and subtle perception.

Cluster C — The Orient of Light

Suhrawardī inherits Avicenna’s Orient but makes it more intense. The Orient becomes the direction of illumination, origin, and angelic source. The Occident becomes exile, opacity, forgetfulness.

Cluster D — Angelology and Light-Hierarchy

Suhrawardī gives a vertical cosmology of lights. This can map onto:

angelic intelligences
governing lights
celestial archetypes
personal guiding light
imaginal order
Cluster E — The Red Intellect

One of the strongest symbolic engines. The intellect appears as a figure, not as an abstraction. This is ideal for Imaginarium because it turns cognition into encounter.

Cluster F — Gabriel’s Wing

Gabriel becomes a mediator between worlds: wing, chant, revelation, descent, ascent. This gives a symbolic model for how higher intelligence communicates through imaginal form.

Cluster G — Childhood / Primordial Seeing

A rare but important cluster: childhood not as sentimentality, but as perception before the world has hardened into fixed adult categories.

7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “Light Is Not a Metaphor”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: The Philosophy of Illumination, light ontology sections.
Function: Establish Suhrawardī’s core: light as the basic structure of being, knowing, and self-disclosure.

Essay 2 — “Knowledge by Presence”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: The Philosophy of Illumination + SEP presential knowledge summary.
Function: Build the Imaginarium epistemology: knowing is not just representing but being present to what discloses itself.

Essay 3 — “The Orient of Illumination”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Avicenna bridge + Suhrawardī’s Oriental/Occidental visionary geography.
Function: Map spiritual directionality: Orient as source, Occident as exile.

Essay 4 — “The Red Intellect”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: The Red Intellect.
Function: Show intellect as imaginal person, old sage, riddle-master, initiatory guide.

Essay 5 — “Gabriel’s Wing”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: The Chant of Gabriel’s Wing.
Function: Angelic mediation: sound, wing, descent, revelation, transmission.

Essay 6 — “The Temples of Light”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Hayākil al-Nūr.
Function: Human subtle anatomy, sense limitation, theomorphic essence, firmaments.

Essay 7 — “Birds After Avicenna”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: Treatise of the Birds.
Function: Bridge Avicenna’s bird-soul to Suhrawardī, then to ʿAṭṭār.

Essay 8 — “Childhood as Primordial Perception”

Target: 2,500–3,000 words
Source base: On the State of Childhood.
Function: Recovering pre-habitual imaginal perception.

Essay 9 — “The Sage of Illumination”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Suhrawardī’s model of the realized sage.
Function: Philosophy as lived transformation, not doctrine.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Light Ontology Pack	Philosophy of Illumination, second part / light metaphysics	Essay 1
Presential Knowledge Pack	Philosophy of Illumination epistemology; SEP support	Essay 2
Orient / Exile Pack	Visionary recitals; especially exile material	Essay 3
Red Intellect Pack	The Red Intellect whole recital	Essay 4
Gabriel Pack	Chant of Gabriel’s Wing whole recital	Essay 5
Hayākil Pack	Hayākil al-Nūr / Shape of Light sections on soul, senses, firmaments	Essay 6
Bird Pack	Treatise of the Birds	Essay 7
Childhood Pack	On the State of Childhood	Essay 8
Sagehood Pack	Illuminationist practice, sagehood, dream of Aristotle	Essay 9
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Light ontology	5/5	Core source for light as ontological principle.
Presential knowledge	5/5	Essential for non-representational knowing.
Angelology	5/5	Strong hierarchy of lights / intelligences.
Imaginal geography	5/5	Orient, Occident, exile, ascent.
Visionary narrative	5/5	Red Intellect, Gabriel’s Wing, Birds, Childhood.
Practical wayfaring	3/5	Present, but Kubrā is stronger for method and dhikr.
Divine love / beauty	3/5	Present, but Rūzbihān is stronger.
Poetic pedagogy	3/5	Present, but ʿAṭṭār/Rūmī are stronger.
Systematic metaphysics	5/5	Stronger than Avicenna for this project’s light metaphysics.
Public accessibility	3/5	Public scans exist, but translation copyright is a serious caution.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Light Ontology from Presential Knowledge.

They are linked, but each deserves its own essay:

Light ontology = what reality is.
Presential knowledge = how reality is known.
Split

Split Red Intellect from Gabriel’s Wing.

Both are angelic/intellective recitals, but:

Red Intellect = wisdom figure / initiatory riddle.
Gabriel’s Wing = angelic mediation / revelation.
Merge

Merge Orient / Exile / Occident into one geography essay.

Delay

Delay The Sage of Illumination until after light ontology and presential knowledge are clear.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

Red Intellect as a figure
Gabriel’s wing
bird-soul recurrence
childhood state
Light of Lights
darkness as opacity
Orient / Occident
dream-vision of Aristotle
the “Ancients” as a revived lineage
11. Overlap warnings
With Avicenna / Corbin

Overlap: Angel, Orient, visionary recital, bird-soul.
Difference: Avicenna gives the map of the soul’s encounter; Suhrawardī makes the map ontological through light.

With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: imaginal world, angelology, presence, divine manifestation.
Difference: Suhrawardī is more hierarchical and light-ontological; Ibn ʿArabī is more theophanic and divine-name based.

With Kubrā

Overlap: lights, colours, visionary perception.
Difference: Suhrawardī gives metaphysical architecture; Kubrā gives more practical phenomenology of visionary lights.

With Rūzbihān

Overlap: divine beauty and visionary encounter.
Difference: Suhrawardī is philosophical-symbolic; Rūzbihān is ecstatic, erotic-theophanic, first-person visionary.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source later
Full spiritual practice instructions	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
Ecstatic love and beauty	Rūzbihān Baqlī
Parable-rich pedagogy	Rūmī
Collective quest narrative	ʿAṭṭār
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
Divine names and prophetic metaphysics	Ibn ʿArabī’s Fuṣūṣ
Compact Sufi symbolic metaphysics	Shabistarī
13. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Light Ontology

Use first.
This gives the whole Imaginarium project a metaphysical backbone.

Target:

Light of Lights
immaterial lights
governing lights
darkness
bodies as barriers / opacity
Pack 2 — Knowledge by Presence

Use second.
This is the epistemological breakthrough.

Target:

presential knowledge
contemplative vision
intuitive apprehension
seeing as knowing
Pack 3 — Red Intellect

Use third.
This gives the imaginal figure of intellect.

Target:

old sage / red intelligence
initiatory dialogue
riddle structure
intellect as encountered person
Pack 4 — Gabriel’s Wing

Use fourth.
This builds the angelic communication model.

Target:

wing imagery
chant / sound
revelation
mediation between worlds
Pack 5 — Hayākil / Temples of Light

Use fifth.
This gives the human-subtle-body and perception map.

Target:

senses
soul levels
theomorphic essence
firmaments
pleasure and pain
14. Final recommended sequence for Suhrawardī companion
Source architecture map
Light Is Not a Metaphor
Knowledge by Presence
Orient and Occident of Illumination
The Red Intellect
Gabriel’s Wing
The Temples of Light
Bird-Soul Bridge: Avicenna → Suhrawardī → ʿAṭṭār
Childhood and Primordial Seeing
The Sage of Illumination
15. Final verdict

Suhrawardī is the correct second source.

Avicenna gave the Angel and the visionary map. Suhrawardī gives the physics of that map: light, presence, darkness, orientation, angelic hierarchy, and imaginal cognition.

For Imaginarium, his core contribution is:

Reality is a hierarchy of lights. Knowing is not merely representing but becoming present to light. The soul is exiled in opacity, but the Orient remains accessible through illumination, angelic mediation, and symbolic vision.

Use this source as the light-ontology foundation of the whole project.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 3: Ibn ʿArabī — Fuṣūṣ al-Ḥikam / The Bezels of Wisdom
1. Source identity

Primary source: Muḥyī al-Dīn Ibn ʿArabī, Fuṣūṣ al-Ḥikam, usually translated as The Bezels of Wisdom or The Seals of Wisdom.

Best public companion base: William C. Chittick, “The Imprint of the Bezels of the Wisdom,” a translation of Ibn ʿArabī’s own Naqsh al-Fuṣūṣ, with abridged Jāmī commentary. Chittick says the Fuṣūṣ is widely recognized as the quintessence of Ibn ʿArabī’s writings and one of the major sources of his influence.

Public source links:

Chittick, “The Imprint of the Bezels”: public PDF via Ibn Arabi Society.

Chittick, “The Chapter Headings of the Fuṣūṣ”: public PDF via Ibn Arabi Society.

Public English Fuṣūṣ PDF scans circulate, but copyright/translation status is unclear, so use mostly summary and structure.

Text type: dense metaphysical scripture-commentary; prophetic wisdom cycle; divine-name ontology; imaginal theophany.

Extraction mode:
Use structural summation + chapter-location mapping + short excerpts only. Chittick’s Imprint is the safest working base because it gives Ibn ʿArabī’s own compressed summary of the Fuṣūṣ and is publicly available through the Ibn Arabi Society.

2. Why this source comes third

Avicenna gave the Angel-guide.
Suhrawardī gave the ontology of Light.
Ibn ʿArabī now gives the metaphysics of manifestation.

The shift is:

Avicenna: the soul travels toward the Angel.
Suhrawardī: reality is a hierarchy of lights.
Ibn ʿArabī: every form is a self-disclosure of the Real.

This is where the Imaginarium stops treating the imaginal as “a realm beside the real” and starts treating form itself as the place where the Real discloses, veils, names, and knows itself.

3. Master structural reading

The Fuṣūṣ is built as a sequence of twenty-seven prophetic wisdoms. Each chapter attaches a specific “wisdom” to a prophet: Adam, Seth, Noah, Idrīs, Abraham, Isaac, Ishmael, Jacob, Joseph, Hūd, Ṣāliḥ, Shuʿayb/Jethro, Lot, Ezra, Jesus, Solomon, David, Jonah, Job, John, Zachariah, Elijah, Luqmān, Aaron, Moses, Khālid, and Muḥammad. The Ibn Arabi Society book listings preserve this sequence across their multi-volume commentary edition.

The structure is not biography. Each prophet is a bezel: a setting in which one jewel of divine wisdom is held and refracted.

So the companion should read each chapter as:

Prophetic form
Specific wisdom-name
Divine-name configuration
Mode of manifestation
Human/perceptual consequence
Imaginarium use
4. Chapter / prophetic function map
Opening architecture
Section	Function
Preface / dream-command	Ibn ʿArabī receives the book through the Prophet; establishes transmission, not self-authored speculation.
Adam	Human being as comprehensive form; mirror of divine names.
Seth	Gift, inheritance, transmission of wisdom.
Noah	Transcendence vs immanence; danger of one-sided theology.
Idrīs / Enoch	Elevation, purity, high station.
Abraham	Intimacy, love, divine friendship.
Isaac / Ishmael	Sacrifice, imagination, obedience, substitution, truth of vision.
Jacob / Joseph	Dream, image, beauty, interpretation.
Middle architecture
Prophet	Function
Hūd	Divine nearness in all directions; breath of mercy.
Ṣāliḥ	Signs, she-camel, miracle, refusal of symbolic recognition.
Shuʿayb / Jethro	Heart, branches of faith, differentiated receptivity.
Lot	Weakness, protection, divine force beyond apparent helplessness.
Ezra	Question of divine power and resurrection.
Jesus	Spirit, word, breath, life-giving form.
Solomon	Kingdom, command, jinn, birds, wind, symbolic sovereignty.
David	Vicegerency, judgment, craft, praise.
Jonah	Constriction, fish-belly, return from darkness.
Job	Trial, body, endurance, hidden mercy.
Final architecture
Prophet	Function
John	Name, uniqueness, purity.
Zachariah	Hidden prayer, subtle request, old age and generation.
Elijah	Transformation, identity across forms.
Luqmān	Wisdom without prophethood; sagehood.
Aaron	Image, mediation, error of worshipping forms wrongly.
Moses	Fire, speech, bewilderment, law, direct address.
Khālid	Barzakh / warning / unfulfilled prophethood motif.
Muḥammad	Totality, seal, most comprehensive form of wisdom.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Human Being as Mirror

Adam is essential. The human is not merely one creature among others but the comprehensive locus in which the divine names are reflected. This is the metaphysical basis for Imaginarium’s “rendering vessel” model.

Use for:

human as microcosm
mirror ontology
divine names
image of God / form of the Real
self as locus, not ego
Cluster B — Divine Names and Forms

The world is a theater of names. Things are not merely objects; they are name-configurations, each revealing a mode of the Real.

Use for:

concept ontology
symbolic tagging
art/concept mapping
divine order
archetypal grammar
Cluster C — Imagination and Vision

Joseph and the sacrifice chapters are key. The dream-image is not “false”; it requires interpretation. Ibn ʿArabī’s world is one where image, form, dream, and event interpenetrate.

Use for:

dreams
active imagination
symbolic cognition
prophetic vision
taʾwīl
Cluster D — Transcendence and Immanence

Noah is crucial because he dramatizes the failure of one-sided theology. The Real must not be restricted to either pure transcendence or crude immanence.

Use for:

avoiding spiritual abstraction
avoiding naive pantheism
balancing form and beyond-form
Cluster E — Breath, Word, and Spirit

Jesus gives breath, word, animation, life-giving form. This is one of the strongest chapters for linking speech, spirit, imagination, and manifestation.

Use for:

spoken world
breath as creative
logos
life in forms
animation
Cluster F — Sovereignty over Imaginal Orders

Solomon is essential for jinn, birds, wind, command, kingdom, and symbolic rulership. This gives a concrete bridge to imaginal ecology rather than abstract metaphysics.

Use for:

angel/jinn taxonomy
symbolic sovereignty
language of birds
command over subtle forces
Cluster G — Bewilderment and Divine Speech

Moses gives direct address, fire, law, mountain, bewilderment. This overlaps with al-Niffarī later, but with more prophetic architecture.

Use for:

revelation
direct address
divine speech
law and encounter
fire-symbolism
Cluster H — Muḥammadan Totality

The final chapter should be delayed until the reader has enough structure. It gathers the whole cycle: seal, totality, human perfection, comprehensive wisdom.

Use for:

completion
seal
total human form
integrative essay
6. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Human Being as the Mirror of the Real”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Adam chapter; Chittick’s Imprint summary.
Function: Establish the human as comprehensive form, mirror, and locus of divine names.

Essay 2 — “The World as Divine Name Configuration”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Adam, Seth, Noah, broader chapter headings.
Function: Show how forms reveal names without being reducible to literal objects.

Essay 3 — “Noah and the Error of One-Sided Theology”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Noah chapter.
Function: Balance transcendence and immanence; prevent flat mysticism.

Essay 4 — “Joseph: Dream, Beauty, and Taʾwīl”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Joseph chapter.
Function: Core Imaginarium essay on dream-image, beauty, symbolic interpretation.

Essay 5 — “The Sacrifice and the Truth of Vision”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Isaac/Ishmael chapters.
Function: Vision is real but must be interpreted; image can be true and still misunderstood.

Essay 6 — “Jesus: Breath, Word, and Life-Giving Form”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Jesus chapter.
Function: Speech/breath as animation; spirit entering form.

Essay 7 — “Solomon’s Kingdom: Birds, Jinn, Wind, and Command”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Solomon chapter.
Function: Imaginal ecology and symbolic sovereignty.

Essay 8 — “Moses: Fire, Speech, and Bewilderment”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Moses chapter.
Function: Divine address as rupture; revelation as fire and speech.

Essay 9 — “The Muḥammadan Seal and the Complete Human”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Muḥammad chapter.
Function: Final integrative essay; only after all prior clusters are established.

7. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Adam Pack	Adam chapter; Imprint Adam summary	Human mirror essay
Divine Names Pack	Adam, Seth, Noah, Muḥammad	World as name-configuration
Noah Pack	Noah chapter	Transcendence/immanence balance
Joseph Pack	Joseph chapter	Dream, beauty, taʾwīl
Sacrifice Pack	Isaac/Ishmael chapters	Vision and interpretation
Jesus Pack	Jesus chapter	Word, breath, spirit, animation
Solomon Pack	Solomon chapter	Jinn, birds, wind, imaginal kingdom
Moses Pack	Moses chapter	Fire, speech, law, bewilderment
Seal Pack	Muḥammad chapter	Completion and totality
8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Divine names	5/5	Core architecture.
Theophany / manifestation	5/5	Strongest source in the queue for this.
Human as mirror	5/5	Adam chapter is foundational.
Imagination / dream	5/5	Joseph and sacrifice chapters are essential.
Angelology	3/5	Present, but less explicit than Avicenna/Suhrawardī.
Imaginal ecology	4/5	Strong through Solomon, jinn, birds, wind.
Prophetic typology	5/5	The entire book is structured this way.
Practical wayfaring	2/5	Less practical than Kubrā or Futūḥāt selections.
Poetic pedagogy	3/5	Dense symbolic prose; less accessible than Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār.
Public accessibility	3/5	Chittick summaries are public; full translations require caution.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Adam / human mirror from Muḥammadan totality.

Do not collapse them. Adam begins the cycle as comprehensive human form; Muḥammad seals the cycle as total integration.

Split

Split Joseph dream-taʾwīl from sacrifice vision.

Both concern vision, but:

Joseph = dream-image, beauty, interpretation.
Sacrifice = obedience, image, substitution, danger of literalizing vision.
Merge

Merge Solomon / birds / jinn / wind into one essay.

This is a strong imaginal ecology cluster and should stay concrete.

Delay

Delay Muḥammad / Seal until the end. It is too integrative to open with.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

Adam as mirror
Joseph’s dream-beauty
Abrahamic sacrifice and substitution
Jesus’ breath
Solomon’s birds, jinn, and wind
Moses’ fire and speech
Jonah in constriction
Job’s body and trial
Khālid as strange marginal prophetic figure
Muḥammad as seal / totality
10. Overlap warnings
With Avicenna / Corbin

Overlap: angelic mediation, imagination, taʾwīl.
Difference: Avicenna is journey-angel-geography; Ibn ʿArabī is manifestation-name-form.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: presence, hierarchy, light, imaginal cognition.
Difference: Suhrawardī uses light ontology; Ibn ʿArabī uses divine-name theophany.

With Futūḥāt

Overlap: imagination, stations, cosmology.
Difference: Fuṣūṣ is compressed prophetic metaphysics; Futūḥāt is vast encyclopedic unfolding.

With Rūmī

Overlap: prophets, stories, symbolic reversals.
Difference: Rūmī teaches through parable; Fuṣūṣ teaches through metaphysical condensation.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better later source
Practical light-vision training	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
Ecstatic beauty and first-person visions	Rūzbihān Baqlī
Accessible narrative pedagogy	Rūmī / ʿAṭṭār
Systematic light ontology	Suhrawardī
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Detailed stations and practices	Futūḥāt selections
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
12. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Adam / Human Mirror

Use first.

Target:

human being as comprehensive form
divine names reflected in the human
world/self/scripture mirroring
Pack 2 — Joseph / Dream-Taʾwīl

Use second.

Target:

dream image
beauty
interpretation
imaginal truth beyond literal surface
Pack 3 — Noah / One-Sided Theology

Use third.

Target:

transcendence
immanence
failure of restriction
idolizing either abstraction or form
Pack 4 — Jesus / Breath-Word

Use fourth.

Target:

breath
spirit
word
animation
form receiving life
Pack 5 — Solomon / Imaginal Kingdom

Use fifth.

Target:

birds
jinn
wind
command
symbolic sovereignty
Pack 6 — Moses / Fire and Speech

Use sixth.

Target:

fire
divine address
law
mountain
bewilderment
13. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map
Adam: Human as Mirror of the Real
World as Divine Name Configuration
Noah: Transcendence and Immanence
Joseph: Dream, Beauty, and Taʾwīl
Sacrifice and the Truth of Vision
Jesus: Breath, Word, and Life-Giving Form
Solomon: Birds, Jinn, Wind, and Command
Moses: Fire, Speech, and Bewilderment
Muḥammad: Seal and Complete Human
14. Final verdict

This is the correct third source.

It should not be used as a quote mine. It should be used as a metaphysical architecture engine.

For Imaginarium, its core contribution is:

Every form is a bezel. Every being is a setting in which a divine name flashes, hides, limits, reveals, and knows itself. The human being is the mirror in which the whole order can become conscious. Dream, prophet, word, breath, bird, jinn, fire, law, and beauty are not decorative religious symbols; they are modes of manifestation.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 4: ʿAṭṭār — Manṭiq al-Ṭayr / The Conference of the Birds
1. Source identity

Primary source: Farīd al-Dīn ʿAṭṭār, Manṭiq al-Ṭayr, usually translated as The Conference of the Birds, The Speech of the Birds, or Bird Parliament.

Best public-access base: Edward FitzGerald’s 1889 Bird Parliament is public domain and available at Sacred Texts. It is abridged and Victorianized, but legally safe.

Useful fuller public scan: C. S. Nott’s Conference of the Birds is available on Internet Archive, but the text states copyright ©1954 by C. S. Nott, so use it mainly for structure and summation, not long quotation.

Text type: Persian Sufi allegorical epic; initiatory bird-journey; poetic manual of annihilation.

Extraction mode:
Use FitzGerald for legally safe public-domain passage work, and Nott / modern summaries for structural orientation. Quote lightly. Summarize extensively.

2. Why this source comes fourth

Avicenna gave the bird-soul as a symbolic ascent.
Suhrawardī gave the light-world.
Ibn ʿArabī gave the metaphysics of manifestation.
ʿAṭṭār now gives the collective initiatory journey.

This is not a doctrine-first text. It is a purification machine disguised as a story.

The core movement:

The birds seek the Simurgh.
Each bird reveals its excuse.
The hoopoe breaks the excuse.
The flock crosses seven valleys.
Thirty birds arrive.
The Simurgh is discovered as si murgh — the thirty birds themselves.

Several public summaries preserve the seven valleys as Quest/Search, Love, Knowledge or Apprehension, Detachment, Unity, Bewilderment/Wonderment, and Poverty/Annihilation.

3. Master structural reading

This source should be read as a typology of resistance.

Each bird is not just a cute allegorical character. Each is a mode of the soul refusing transformation:

Bird / figure	Soul-function
Hoopoe	Sufi guide, initiator, ruthless interpreter
Nightingale	Attachment to beauty / romance / aesthetic intoxication
Parrot	Desire for immortality without transformation
Peacock	Nostalgia for paradise, shame, lost glory
Duck	Pseudo-purity, clinging to water / ritual exteriority
Partridge	Jewel-love, greed for hidden treasure
Humay	Royal ambition, power fantasy
Hawk	Attachment to court, rank, service to kings
Heron	Melancholy solitude, attachment to the sea’s edge
Owl	Ruin-love, treasure-hoarding, spiritual desolation
Sparrow	Weakness excuse, self-belittlement

The hoopoe’s work is diagnostic: each bird thinks it is giving a reason, but actually exposes its bondage.

4. Part / movement map
Movement I — Assembly of the Birds

The birds realize they lack a king. The hoopoe reveals the Simurgh.

Function: establishes spiritual lack: the soul senses disorder before it knows the path.

Movement II — Excuses of the Birds

Each bird offers a reason not to travel.

Function: typology of evasions. This is the best essay material in the whole text.

Movement III — Hoopoe’s Replies and Teaching Tales

The hoopoe answers through stories, reversals, and humiliations.

Function: imaginal pedagogy. Teaching occurs through narrative shock, not abstract argument.

Movement IV — The Seven Valleys

The journey becomes formal: Quest, Love, Knowledge/Apprehension, Detachment, Unity, Bewilderment, Poverty/Annihilation.

Function: initiatory map.

Movement V — Arrival at the Simurgh

Only thirty birds arrive. They discover the Simurgh as their own transfigured collectivity.

Function: annihilation of the seeker-object split.

5. Seven valleys function map
Valley	Function for Imaginarium
Quest / Search	The soul breaks ordinary inertia.
Love	Reason and self-protection are burned.
Knowledge / Apprehension	Knowing becomes direct, differentiated, path-specific.
Detachment / Independence	The world loses its binding glamour.
Unity	Multiplicity is seen as one field.
Bewilderment / Wonderment	Conceptual control collapses.
Poverty and Annihilation	The seeker disappears into what was sought.

Do not flatten these into “self-development stages.” They are destructive, purifying, and disorienting.

6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Hoopoe as Initiatory Guide

The hoopoe is not a gentle therapist. It is the master-bird who exposes evasions.

Use for:

guide / daimon / initiator
harsh mercy
symbolic diagnosis
spiritual authority
speech that cuts
Cluster B — The Birds as Soul-Typology

This is the strongest practical cluster. Each bird is a personality-mask.

Use for:

ego roles
evasive selfing
symbolic psychology
“rendering regimes”
concept-to-art mapping
Cluster C — Excuse as Revelation

The bird’s excuse is not incidental. It reveals the exact form of bondage.

Use for:

shadow work
false vocation
spiritual bypass
attachment diagnosis
Cluster D — Seven Valleys

This is the formal initiatory path.

Use for:

spiritual journey map
video/essay sequence
practice-phase architecture
annihilation model
Cluster E — Simurgh / Si Murgh

The final pun is the metaphysical climax: the transcendent king is discovered through the transformed collective.

Use for:

mirror ontology
unity and multiplicity
annihilation of seeker/sought
imaginal kingship
Cluster F — Birds, Flight, and Failure

Many birds never arrive. Some are frightened, exhausted, or lost. This matters.

Use for:

cost of initiation
non-sentimental mysticism
spiritual attrition
path difficulty
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Hoopoe and the Diagnosis of the Soul”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Assembly + hoopoe’s opening teaching.
Function: Establish the guide as diagnostic force.

Essay 2 — “Every Bird Is an Excuse”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: excuses of nightingale, parrot, peacock, duck, partridge, hawk, owl, sparrow.
Function: Best Imaginarium practical essay: each bird as a rendering regime.

Essay 3 — “The Nightingale’s Rose”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: nightingale material.
Function: Beauty-attachment, aesthetic intoxication, love of form that refuses the Real.

Essay 4 — “The Peacock at the Gate of Paradise”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: peacock material.
Function: Lost paradise, shame, nostalgia, spiritual vanity.

Essay 5 — “The Seven Valleys as a Map of Unmaking”

Target: 4,000–5,500 words
Source base: seven valleys.
Function: Main initiatory architecture essay.

Essay 6 — “Bewilderment Before Annihilation”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: sixth and seventh valleys.
Function: The collapse of conceptual mastery before fanāʾ.

Essay 7 — “Simurgh: The King Who Was the Birds”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: final arrival.
Function: Mirror, unity, collective transformation, seeker/sought collapse.

Essay 8 — “From Avicenna’s Bird to ʿAṭṭār’s Flock”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Avicenna’s Recital of the Bird + ʿAṭṭār’s frame story.
Function: Cross-source bridge.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Hoopoe Pack	Opening assembly; hoopoe’s call to seek the Simurgh	Guide essay
Excuses Pack	Individual bird excuses	Soul-typology essay
Nightingale Pack	Nightingale and rose	Beauty-attachment essay
Peacock Pack	Peacock and paradise	Exile / nostalgia essay
Valley Pack	Seven valleys section	Initiatory path essay
Bewilderment Pack	Valley of Bewilderment + Poverty/Annihilation	Advanced fanāʾ essay
Simurgh Pack	Final arrival of thirty birds	Unity / mirror essay
Bridge Pack	FitzGerald public-domain bird material + Avicenna bird recital summary	Avicenna-to-ʿAṭṭār essay
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Initiatory journey	5/5	One of the best sources in the queue.
Symbolic animals	5/5	Core structure.
Soul-typology	5/5	Each bird is a soul-mask.
Annihilation	5/5	Culminates in poverty / fanāʾ.
Imaginal pedagogy	5/5	Teaching through stories, reversals, animal-symbols.
Angelology	1/5	Not the point; Avicenna/Suhrawardī are stronger.
Divine-name metaphysics	2/5	Ibn ʿArabī stronger.
Practical light phenomenology	1/5	Kubrā stronger.
Public accessibility	4/5	FitzGerald is public domain; fuller versions need caution.
Art usefulness	5/5	Birds, hoopoe, Simurgh, valleys, flight, Qāf.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Bird-Typology from Seven Valleys.

The first is diagnostic.
The second is initiatory.

Split

Split Nightingale and Peacock into their own smaller essays.

They are too visually and psychologically rich to bury inside a general bird list.

Merge

Merge minor bird excuses into one “Every Bird Is an Excuse” essay.

Delay

Delay Simurgh until after the valleys. Otherwise the ending becomes a slogan.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

hoopoe as guide
nightingale’s rose
peacock’s lost paradise
duck’s water-purity
partridge’s jewels
hawk’s court-service
owl’s ruins
sparrow’s weakness
Mount Qāf
seven valleys
thirty birds / si murgh
deaths and failures along the path
11. Overlap warnings
With Avicenna

Overlap: bird-soul, journey, Mount Qāf, ascent.
Difference: Avicenna gives solitary philosophical ascent; ʿAṭṭār gives collective poetic initiation.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: journey, Orient, symbolic cognition.
Difference: Suhrawardī is light-metaphysics; ʿAṭṭār is parabolic unmaking.

With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: unity, multiplicity, annihilation of separateness.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī explains through divine names and prophetic forms; ʿAṭṭār dramatizes through birds and humiliating stories.

With Rūmī

Overlap: parable, shock, reversal, animal symbolism.
Difference: Rūmī is sprawling and conversational; ʿAṭṭār is architecturally concentrated around one quest.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better later source
Technical metaphysics	Ibn ʿArabī
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Angel-guide cosmology	Avicenna / Corbin
Practical visionary lights	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
First-person ecstatic vision	Rūzbihān Baqlī
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Compact metaphysical symbolism	Shabistarī
13. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Hoopoe / Guide

Use first.
This defines the initiatory voice.

Target:

assembly of birds
lack of king
hoopoe’s authority
revelation of Simurgh
Pack 2 — Bird Excuses

Use second.
This is the best diagnostic material.

Target:

nightingale
parrot
peacock
duck
partridge
hawk
owl
sparrow
Pack 3 — Seven Valleys

Use third.
This provides the path-map.

Target:

Quest
Love
Knowledge/Apprehension
Detachment
Unity
Bewilderment
Poverty/Annihilation
Pack 4 — Simurgh / Thirty Birds

Use fourth.
This gives the final metaphysical reversal.

Target:

arrival
mirror recognition
si murgh pun
king/seeker collapse
Pack 5 — Avicenna Bridge

Use fifth.
This links source 1 and source 4.

Target:

Avicenna’s bird-soul
ʿAṭṭār’s flock
solitary ascent vs collective annihilation
14. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map
The Hoopoe and the Diagnosis of the Soul
Every Bird Is an Excuse
The Nightingale’s Rose
The Peacock at the Gate of Paradise
The Seven Valleys as a Map of Unmaking
Bewilderment Before Annihilation
Simurgh: The King Who Was the Birds
From Avicenna’s Bird to ʿAṭṭār’s Flock
Art / video visual map: birds, valleys, Qāf, Simurgh
15. Final verdict

ʿAṭṭār is the correct fourth source.

Its core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The soul does not usually refuse the Real directly. It refuses through style: beauty, purity, power, nostalgia, weakness, melancholy, rank, jewels, paradise, romance. The hoopoe exposes each style as an excuse. The path then carries the birds through quest, love, knowledge, detachment, unity, bewilderment, and annihilation until the sought king is discovered as the transformed flock itself.

Use this source as the project’s symbolic psychology of excuses and initiatory unmaking.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 5: Ibn ʿArabī — selected Futūḥāt al-Makkiyya / The Meccan Revelations
1. Source identity

Primary source: Muḥyī al-Dīn Ibn ʿArabī, al-Futūḥāt al-Makkiyya, usually translated as The Meccan Openings or The Meccan Revelations.

Best public companion base: Muhyiddin Ibn Arabi Society pages by James W. Morris, especially “Introduction to The Meccan Revelations,” “How to Study the Futūḥāt,” and “Spiritual Practice and Other Translations.” The Society identifies the Futūḥāt material as translations from Ibn ʿArabī’s vast work by Michel Chodkiewicz, William Chittick, and James Morris.

Core public-access packet: James Morris’s “Spiritual Imagination and the ‘Liminal’ World,” translating/discussing Futūḥāt chapter 63 on the Barzakh, is publicly listed by the Ibn Arabi Society and also available as a PDF through Sufism.ir. Copyright/public-domain caution: The modern English Meccan Revelations volumes are copyrighted selections, so do not use them as a long-quote base. PIR Press describes Volume I as 22 selected chapters from Ibn ʿArabī’s Futūḥāt on Divine Names, spiritual experience, resurrection, and stages on the path to human perfection.

Use structured summation, short excerpts, chapter references, and public article scaffolding.

Text type: encyclopedic mystical summa; spiritual cosmology; practice manual; metaphysics of imagination; stations and unveilings.

Extraction mode:
Use thematic extraction, not linear coverage of the whole text. The Futūḥāt is too vast for a normal companion. Build selected passage packs around imagination, barzakh, dreams, spiritual practice, bodies of light, stations, resurrection imagery, divine names, and realization.

2. Why this source comes fifth

The prior source, Fuṣūṣ al-Ḥikam, gave the compressed metaphysical skeleton: prophetic wisdoms, divine names, and forms of manifestation.

The Futūḥāt gives the lived, sprawling, visionary ecology:

Fuṣūṣ: the jewel-settings of prophetic wisdom.
Futūḥāt: the immense world in which those wisdoms become stations, dreams, bodies, practices, signs, unveilings, errors, and transformed perception.

This source should not be treated as “more Ibn ʿArabī.” It performs a different function: it is not the compact architecture; it is the field manual of realization.

3. Master structural reading

The Futūḥāt is not best approached front-to-back. Morris notes that Ibn ʿArabī’s work has a huge architectonic table of contents, with 560 chapters, and that the elaborate outline precedes the Introduction.

For Imaginarium, treat it as a modular universe:

Cosmic architecture — worlds, barzakh, resurrection, spiritual realities.
Perceptual training — dreams, unveiling, discernment, imagination.
Practice engine — advice to seekers, spiritual disciplines, adab, stations.
Subtle embodiment — body of light, after-death perception, imaginal form.
Divine-human responsiveness — call/response, prayer, inspiration, receptivity.
Pedagogical storytelling — Ibn ʿArabī teaches through incidents, dreams, reports, and sudden reversals.

This source is therefore best used as selected thematic dossiers, not a single essay sequence pretending to cover the whole work.

4. Part / chapter packet map
Packet A — Introduction / architectonic frame
Source	Function
Morris, “Introduction to The Meccan Revelations”	Explains the origin, distinctive character, audience, style, and structure of the work.
Morris, “How to Study the Futūḥāt”	Meta-method: how to approach the text without flattening it into ordinary doctrine.
Chodkiewicz / Chittick / Morris selected translations	Reliable scholarly edition base, but copyright cautious.
Packet B — Barzakh / spiritual imagination
Source	Function
Futūḥāt chapter 63, “Spiritual Imagination and the Liminal World”	Core Imaginarium source. Barzakh as intermediate world, dream logic, imaginal embodiment.
Morris public PDF	Best legally usable working base for summary and short excerpts.
Packet C — Dreams and mubashshirāt
Source	Function
Morris, “Some Dreams of Ibn Arabi”	First-person dream material; visionary communications; prophetic dream ecology.
Ibn Arabi Society spiritual-practice page	Lists this as a public PDF from the Society newsletter.
Packet D — Body of Light
Source	Function
Morris, “Body of Light: Ibn ʿArabī’s Account of His Father’s Death”	Subtle embodiment, death, luminosity, imaginal body. Listed publicly by Ibn Arabi Society.
Packet E — Spiritual advice / seeker manual
Source	Function
“Book of Spiritual Advice” / “Quintessence of What is Indispensable for the Spiritual Seeker”	Practice architecture, adab, warnings, purification, receptivity. Listed publicly by Ibn Arabi Society.
Packet F — Resurrection / symbolic events
Source	Function
Chapters surrounding resurrection imagery	Public PDF notes that the chapters around barzakh follow symbolic “events” and “places” of Resurrection, including Gehenna and other eschatological images.
Meccan Revelations selected volumes	Use as structure, not long quotation.
5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Theme / chapter area	Imaginarium function
Futūḥāt introduction	Explains why the work is intentionally vast, layered, and not reducible to doctrine.
Chapter 63: Barzakh	Central imaginal ontology: the between-world that joins and separates.
Dreams / mubashshirāt	Practical visionary data; dream as disclosure, warning, instruction.
Body of Light	Subtle embodiment; death as transformation of perceptual form.
Book of Spiritual Advice	Practice, purification, seeker orientation.
Divine Names chapters	Bridges back to Fuṣūṣ: names as experiential not merely metaphysical.
Resurrection chapters	Imaginal geography of afterlife, judgment, symbolic embodiment.
Stations / manāzil	Path structure; lived transformation over time.
Spiritual sensitivity / discernment	Distinguishing inspiration, fantasy, error, and true disclosure.
Storytelling / recounting blessings	Pedagogy through spiritual communication, not abstract system only.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Barzakh as the Liminal World

This is the core Imaginarium cluster.

Barzakh is not merely “between” in a weak sense. It both separates and joins: spirit/body, visible/invisible, dream/waking, meaning/form, absence/presence.

Use for:

imaginal ontology
symbolic perception
mirror-worlds
dream-body
liminality
intermediate cognition
Cluster B — Spiritual Imagination

This is not fantasy-production. It is a faculty through which meanings take form and forms reveal meanings.

Use for:

active imagination
dream temple work
visionary perception
symbolic embodiment
art/video storyboarding
inner-world mapping
Cluster C — Dreams as Instruction

Dreams in this source are not decorative anecdotes. They become modes of teaching, warning, confirmation, and unveiling.

Use for:

dream practice
visionary autobiography
symbolic literacy
spiritual communication
night-work / threshold states
Cluster D — Body of Light

This cluster is vital for the project’s subtle-body layer. It gives a way to speak of luminous embodiment without reducing it to metaphor.

Use for:

subtle body
post-mortem vision
imaginal body
light-form
transitional embodiment
Cluster E — Practice, Adab, and Discernment

The Futūḥāt becomes more useful when tied to practice and warning. Visionary experience without adab becomes inflation, confusion, or false interpretation.

Use for:

discipline
humility
spiritual sensitivity
discernment
criteria for imaginal material
Cluster F — Resurrection as Imaginal Geography

The resurrection chapters are valuable because they make afterlife symbols function as imaginal places, bodies, events, and transformations.

Use for:

symbolic geography
afterlife as imaginal ontology
judgment as disclosure
form matching inner reality
Cluster G — Divine-Human Responsiveness

Ibn ʿArabī’s world is responsive. The Real calls; the servant responds; prayer, inspiration, and realization unfold in reciprocal relation.

Use for:

vocation
call/response
daimonic summons
divine address
guided synchronicity without slop
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “Barzakh: The World That Joins by Separating”

Target: 4,000–5,500 words
Source base: Futūḥāt chapter 63 via Morris, “Spiritual Imagination and the Liminal World.”
Function: Define the imaginal world as a rigorous intermediate ontology.

Essay 2 — “Spiritual Imagination Is Not Fantasy”

Target: 3,500–5,000 words
Source base: chapter 63 + Morris introduction.
Function: Establish imagination as a truth-bearing faculty with laws, not arbitrary invention.

Essay 3 — “Dreams as Openings”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: “Some Dreams of Ibn Arabi.”
Function: Dream as teaching, warning, and spiritual communication.

Essay 4 — “The Body of Light”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Morris, “Body of Light.”
Function: Subtle embodiment, death, luminosity, imaginal body.

Essay 5 — “The Seeker’s Necessary Adab”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: “Book of Spiritual Advice” / “Quintessence of What is Indispensable.”
Function: Practice-frame for visionary work: humility, discipline, purification, receptivity.

Essay 6 — “The Resurrection as Imaginal Geography”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Futūḥāt resurrection chapters around chapters 61–63; Morris barzakh framing.
Function: Afterlife imagery as symbolic geography and transformed embodiment.

Essay 7 — “Discernment in a World of Openings”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Morris materials on spiritual sensitivity and judgment, plus advice texts.
Function: Criteria for inspiration, imagination, fantasy, and unveiling.

Essay 8 — “How to Study the Ocean”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: Morris, “How to Study the Futūḥāt.”
Function: Meta-essay: how to approach a non-linear mystical summa.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Barzakh Pack	Futūḥāt ch. 63; Morris PDF	Core imaginal ontology
Imagination Pack	ch. 63 + Morris introduction	Spiritual imagination vs fantasy
Dreams Pack	“Some Dreams of Ibn Arabi”	Dream instruction essay
Body of Light Pack	“Body of Light”	Subtle embodiment essay
Advice Pack	“Book of Spiritual Advice”; “Quintessence…”	Practice/adab essay
Resurrection Pack	chs. 61–63 and surrounding eschatological structure	Imaginal geography
Study Method Pack	“How to Study the Futūḥāt”	Reader orientation
Divine Names Pack	selected Meccan Revelations passages	Bridge back to Fuṣūṣ
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Barzakh / liminal ontology	5/5	Strongest source in queue for rigorous intermediate world.
Spiritual imagination	5/5	Central Imaginarium source.
Dreams	5/5	Publicly accessible dream material through Morris.
Body of light	5/5	Excellent subtle-body bridge.
Practical adab	4/5	Strong through advice texts; Kubrā later is more technique-specific.
Divine names	4/5	Strong, but Fuṣūṣ is cleaner for architecture.
Resurrection geography	5/5	Powerful imaginal geography packet.
Angelology	3/5	Present, but not the cleanest source for angel hierarchy.
Poetic pedagogy	3/5	Present through stories, but Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār are stronger.
Public accessibility	4/5	Good public article base; full volumes remain copyright-cautious.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Barzakh from Spiritual Imagination.

They are deeply linked, but:

Barzakh = ontological structure.
Spiritual imagination = faculty / mode of perception.
Split

Split Dreams from Body of Light.

Both involve subtle perception, but:

dreams = instruction and communication.
body of light = embodiment and death/transformation.
Merge

Merge practice, adab, and discernment into one major practical cluster, then split off a later essay specifically on discernment if enough material accumulates.

Delay

Delay Divine Names here because Fuṣūṣ already covered the architecture better. Use Futūḥāt divine-name material only when it adds experiential or practical concreteness.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

Barzakh as joining/separating
mirror-like existence of images
dreams as mubashshirāt
body of light at death
symbolic places of resurrection
fires and afterlife forms
seeker advice as practical adab
the huge 560-chapter architecture
the table of contents as part of the revelation’s structure
11. Overlap warnings
With Fuṣūṣ al-Ḥikam

Overlap: divine names, manifestation, prophetic metaphysics.
Difference: Fuṣūṣ is compressed metaphysical architecture; Futūḥāt is practice, cosmology, dream, station, and experiential unfolding.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: imaginal world, light, presence, subtle reality.
Difference: Suhrawardī is light-ontology; Futūḥāt is barzakh-imagination-practice ecology.

With Avicenna / Corbin

Overlap: angelic guidance, visionary geography, soul-exegesis.
Difference: Avicenna/Corbin gives the soul’s visionary map; Futūḥāt gives the full cosmological and practical ecosystem.

With Kubrā

Overlap: practice, lights, visionary phenomena.
Difference: Kubrā is more phenomenological and colour/light-practice focused; Futūḥāt is more universal-cosmological.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better later source
Colour-coded visionary lights	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
First-person erotic-theophanic ecstasy	Rūzbihān Baqlī
Apophatic standing before divine address	al-Niffarī
Simple poetic teaching stories	Rūmī
Collective initiatory animal-symbol journey	ʿAṭṭār
Pure light hierarchy	Suhrawardī
Angel-guide recital	Avicenna / Corbin
13. Variety review

This source adds a new layer that the first four did not fully cover:

Prior source	What it gave	What Futūḥāt adds
Avicenna / Corbin	Angelic journey	Practical and cosmic ecosystem
Suhrawardī	Light ontology	Barzakh and imagination as liminal ontology
Fuṣūṣ	Divine-name architecture	Stations, dreams, practice, afterlife geography
ʿAṭṭār	Poetic initiatory quest	Encyclopedic mystical field manual

So this is not redundant. It is the first source in the sequence that can support a full practice-and-discernment layer for Imaginarium.

14. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Barzakh

Use first.

Target:

Futūḥāt chapter 63
spiritual imagination
intermediate world
joining/separating
dream/body/meaning relations
Pack 2 — Dreams

Use second.

Target:

“Some Dreams of Ibn Arabi”
dream as instruction
dream as communication
dream as threshold disclosure
Pack 3 — Body of Light

Use third.

Target:

“Body of Light”
luminous embodiment
death/transformation
imaginal body
Pack 4 — Spiritual Advice

Use fourth.

Target:

“Book of Spiritual Advice”
“Quintessence of What is Indispensable”
adab
seeker discipline
humility and discernment
Pack 5 — Resurrection Geography

Use fifth.

Target:

chapters around barzakh and resurrection
symbolic afterlife places
form matching inward reality
judgment as disclosure
15. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: how to study the ocean
Barzakh: The World That Joins by Separating
Spiritual Imagination Is Not Fantasy
Dreams as Openings
The Body of Light
The Seeker’s Necessary Adab
Discernment in a World of Openings
The Resurrection as Imaginal Geography
Divine Names in Practice
Bridge note: Fuṣūṣ as skeleton, Futūḥāt as living world
16. Final verdict

This is the correct fifth source.

Its core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal is not just a symbolic realm or a poetic technique. It is the barzakh: the liminal world that joins by separating, where meanings take bodies, dreams become instruction, death reveals luminous embodiment, resurrection unfolds as symbolic geography, and spiritual practice trains the seeker to discern true openings from fantasy.

Use this source as the project’s barzakh / practice / dream / body-of-light engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 6: Rūzbihān Baqlī — Kashf al-Asrār / The Unveiling of Secrets
1. Source identity

Primary source: Rūzbihān Baqlī, Kashf al-Asrār, translated by Carl W. Ernst as The Unveiling of Secrets: Diary of a Sufi Master.

Author: Rūzbihān Baqlī, 1128–1209, Persian Sufi master associated with Shiraz. He is known for visionary autobiography, ecstatic sayings, divine beauty, and dense first-person mystical prose. Public biographical summaries note that he had visionary experiences from childhood, left Fasa as a teenager for a desert retreat, later established a hospice in Shiraz, and died in 1209.

Best public-access base: Carl Ernst’s public page describes The Unveiling of Secrets as a “visionary diary of astonishing intensity,” written by a major figure in Persian Sufism. The Accessing Muslim Lives page gives a short public excerpt and says the work is autobiographical, dominated by visions and spiritual ecstasies or “unveilings.”

Copyright caution: Ernst’s English translation is modern and copyrighted. Use this source mainly through extensive summation, public excerpts, scholarly descriptions, review materials, and short legally safe quotations only. Avoid long extraction.

Text type: visionary autobiography; Sufi diary; rhetoric of sainthood; ecstatic first-person imaginal testimony.

Extraction mode:
Use structured summation and episode mapping. Because the public text is limited, build the companion from:

Ernst’s public description
available public excerpts
library/review metadata
short scholarly summaries
cautious paraphrase of known episodes
cross-reference to Ernst’s Ruzbihan Baqli: Mysticism and the Rhetoric of Sainthood in Persian Sufism
2. Why this source comes sixth

The first five sources built the architecture:

Earlier source	What it gave
Avicenna / Corbin	Angel-guide, soul-exegesis, Orient/Occident
Suhrawardī	Light ontology, presential knowledge, illumination
Ibn ʿArabī’s Fuṣūṣ	Divine names, manifestation, prophetic wisdoms
ʿAṭṭār	Bird-soul typology, excuses, valleys, annihilation
Ibn ʿArabī’s Futūḥāt	Barzakh, dreams, body of light, practice, imaginal ecology

Rūzbihān now adds something different:

Not system, not parable, not symbolic epic — but first-person visionary intensity.

This source is valuable because it shows the imaginal from inside the visionary subject: childhood ecstasies, encounters with God, angels, prophets, saints, beauty, fragrance, luminous forms, overwhelming states, and the self-presentation of sainthood.

3. Master structural reading

Read Kashf al-Asrār as a visionary autobiography of unveiling.

The main question is not:

“What doctrine does Rūzbihān teach?”

but:

“How does a saint narrate the formation of visionary perception?”

The source works through escalating episodes:

Childhood signs — early visions, spiritual sensitivity, pre-doctrinal ecstasy.
Withdrawal and desert formation — the soul exits ordinary social rendering.
Unveilings — visions of God, angels, prophets, saints, lights, beauties.
Ecstatic legitimation — the visionary self is authorized through encounter.
Beauty-theology — divine beauty appears through faces, forms, fragrance, voices, and inner qualities.
Rhetoric of sainthood — the writing does not merely report sanctity; it constructs a saintly voice.

Public summaries support this basic frame: the work is first-person, autobiographical, vision-dominated, and focused on spiritual ecstasies or unveilings.

4. Part / episode map

Because a clean public table of contents is not readily available, treat the text as episode-clusters rather than a chapter-by-chapter source.

Episode Cluster A — Childhood visions
Function	Use
Early visionary susceptibility	Shows that perception can be marked before formal doctrine.
Dreams and ecstasies at young ages	Builds the “visionary temperament” essay.
Family / ordinary world contrast	The saint appears as already misaligned with ordinary rendering.
Public biographical summaries say Rūzbihān claimed visions at ages three, seven, and fifteen.
Episode Cluster B — Desert withdrawal
Function	Use
Departure from Fasa	Break with ordinary life.
Solitude / austerity	Formation of visionary capacity.
First major unveilings	Threshold from sensitivity into realized encounter.
Public summaries state that at fifteen he left Fasa and spent eighteen months in the desert, receiving more visions.
Episode Cluster C — Encounters with God, angels, prophets, saints
Function	Use
God	Theophany and overwhelming presence.
Angels	Imaginal intermediaries and authorization.
Prophets	Prophetic lineage as visionary community.
Sufi saints	Transmission through the imaginal assembly.
Public descriptions emphasize visionary encounters with God, angels, prophets, and Sufi saints.
Episode Cluster D — Beauty, fragrance, face, voice
Function	Use
Beauty as divine sign	Not aesthetic decoration but theophanic perception.
Fine fragrances	Subtle sensory theology.
Beautiful face	Form as epiphany.
Sweet voices	Sound as beauty-bearing disclosure.
Public biographical material notes Rūzbihān’s love of beauty, including fine fragrances, beautiful faces, and sweet voices. King’s College London notes that he argued the goal of Muslim life was to become beautiful morally and spiritually, imitating divine beauty.
Episode Cluster E — Ecstatic sayings and sainthood
Function	Use
Shath / ecstatic utterance	Speech under pressure of unveiling.
Defense of earlier ecstatic Sufis	Links Rūzbihān to Hallāj and ecstatic tradition.
“Doctor Ecstaticus” profile	Makes him a bridge between vision and dangerous speech.
Public summaries note his fondness for and defense of early Sufi ecstatic sayings, especially through Sharḥ al-Shaṭḥiyyāt, completed in 1174.
5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Source area	Imaginarium function
Childhood visions	Visionary perception before formal spiritual identity.
Desert retreat	Deconditioning of ordinary rendering.
First unveiling	Threshold event: world becomes transparent to presence.
Encounters with God	Theophanic intensity; danger of abstraction collapsing into presence.
Encounters with angels	Imaginal mediation; authority; guidance.
Encounters with prophets	Prophetic community as imaginal lineage.
Encounters with saints	Sainthood as living transhistorical network.
Beauty theology	Sensory world as divine epiphany.
Fragrance / voice / face	Subtle sensory signs; concrete imaginal details.
Ecstatic utterance	Language stretched past ordinary syntax.
Rhetoric of sainthood	How visionary narrative authorizes the speaker.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — First-Person Visionary Autobiography

This is the main reason to include Rūzbihān. Unlike Corbin’s commentary or Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysics, this source shows a visionary subject narrating his own formation.

Use for:

visionary diary mode
first-person encounter
saintly self-narration
spiritual memory
interior documentary prose
Cluster B — Childhood Ecstasy

This gives a rare account of early visionary perception: childhood as susceptibility to unseen worlds.

Use for:

primordial seeing
pre-conceptual imaginal sensitivity
childhood state after Suhrawardī
early signs of vocation
Cluster C — Desert as Re-Rendering Chamber

The desert is not just landscape. It is a perceptual machine: solitude, heat, hunger, exposure, silence, and deprivation become conditions under which the ordinary world loosens.

Use for:

retreat
deconditioning
exile
threshold states
renunciation as altered rendering
Cluster D — Theophanic Beauty

Rūzbihān is essential for beauty. The beautiful face, fragrance, sweet voice, and inner moral beauty become sites of divine disclosure.

Use for:

aesthetic theophany
beauty as path
sensory transfiguration
divine names of beauty
avoiding dry metaphysics
Cluster E — Angels, Prophets, Saints as Imaginal Community

The visionary is not alone. He enters a community beyond historical time.

Use for:

imaginal lineage
transhistorical teachers
saintly assembly
dream/vision contacts
prophetic authorization
Cluster F — Ecstatic Speech

Rūzbihān helps explain speech when the ordinary self cannot contain the encounter. This is crucial for handling shath, visionary excess, and the boundary between inspiration and inflation.

Use for:

dangerous utterance
ecstatic prose
Hallāj bridge
speech under unveiling
rhetoric of excess
Cluster G — Sainthood as Rhetorical Construction

The source is not naïve. It should be read as both testimony and self-fashioning. Ernst’s scholarly framing of Rūzbihān as “mysticism and the rhetoric of sainthood” is important here.

Use for:

critical balance
avoiding gullible mysticism
sainthood as textual performance
authority construction
visionary autobiography as genre
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Visionary Diary as Spiritual Evidence”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Ernst public introduction + available excerpts + biographical summaries.
Function: Establish Rūzbihān as first-person visionary source, not system-builder.

Essay 2 — “Childhood Ecstasy and the First Unveilings”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: early life episodes; visions at ages three, seven, fifteen.
Function: Explore imaginal perception before doctrine.

Essay 3 — “The Desert as a Machine of Unveiling”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: departure from Fasa; eighteen-month desert period.
Function: Show solitude and exposure as re-rendering conditions.

Essay 4 — “Beauty Is a Theophany”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: beauty theology, fragrance, face, voice, moral beautification.
Function: Prevent the project becoming dry metaphysics. Beauty is perception transformed.

Essay 5 — “Angels, Prophets, and Saints in the Visionary Assembly”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: public summaries of encounters with God, angels, prophets, Sufi saints.
Function: Build imaginal community / lineage essay.

Essay 6 — “Ecstatic Speech and the Danger of Saying Too Much”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Rūzbihān’s defense of ecstatic sayings and Hallāj tradition.
Function: Give criteria for shath, inspiration, excess, and inflation.

Essay 7 — “Rhetoric of Sainthood”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Ernst’s scholarly frame.
Function: Critical essay: how visionary autobiography authorizes its speaker.

Essay 8 — “Rūzbihān After Ibn ʿArabī: Theophany as Sensory Overwhelm”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: compare Ibn ʿArabī manifestation with Rūzbihān beauty/ecstasy.
Function: Bridge metaphysical theophany into lived sensory ecstasy.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / public base	Use
Public Intro Pack	Ernst public page on Unveiling of Secrets	Source identity / visionary diary
Childhood Pack	public biographical summaries + short excerpts	Childhood ecstasy essay
Desert Pack	Fasa departure and desert retreat summaries	Retreat / deconditioning essay
Theophanic Beauty Pack	KCL beauty summary + biographical notes on fragrance, face, voice	Beauty essay
Visionary Encounters Pack	public descriptions of God, angels, prophets, saints	Imaginal assembly essay
Ecstatic Sayings Pack	summaries of Sharḥ al-Shaṭḥiyyāt and Hallāj defense	Shath essay
Rhetoric Pack	Ernst’s Rhetoric of Sainthood framing	Critical balance essay
Cross-Source Pack	Ibn ʿArabī theophany + Rūzbihān beauty	Bridge essay
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
First-person visionary testimony	5/5	Strongest source in queue.
Divine beauty	5/5	Essential beauty-theology source.
Angels / prophets / saints	4/5	Strong as encounters, less systematic than Avicenna.
Ecstatic prose	5/5	Excellent for shath and visionary excess.
Childhood visionary perception	5/5	Rare and valuable.
Practice instructions	2/5	More autobiographical than manual.
Light ontology	2/5	Suhrawardī stronger.
Divine-name metaphysics	3/5	Ibn ʿArabī stronger.
Imaginal geography	3/5	Present through visions, less formally mapped.
Public accessibility	3/5	Public summaries and excerpts exist; translation is copyrighted.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Beauty from Visionary Encounters.

Beauty needs its own essay because it is Rūzbihān’s unique contribution. Do not bury it under generic “visions.”

Split

Split Ecstatic Speech from Rhetoric of Sainthood.

Ecstatic speech = phenomenology of utterance under unveiling.
Rhetoric of sainthood = critical reading of how the text constructs authority.
Merge

Merge angels, prophets, and saints into Visionary Assembly.

This keeps the focus on the transhistorical imaginal community.

Delay

Delay Rhetoric of Sainthood until after the more sympathetic essays. If you start critically, the visionary power gets flattened.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

visions at ages three, seven, fifteen
teenage desert retreat
encounters with God, angels, prophets, saints
fine fragrances
beautiful faces
sweet voices
moral beauty as imitation of divine beauty
ecstatic sayings
Hallāj connection
Shiraz hospice
saintly self-narration
11. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: theophany, divine manifestation, prophetic worlds.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī gives metaphysical architecture; Rūzbihān gives sensory and autobiographical overwhelm.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: vision, light, angelic encounter.
Difference: Suhrawardī is illuminationist philosophy; Rūzbihān is ecstatic diary.

With Avicenna / Corbin

Overlap: angelic encounter and visionary journey.
Difference: Avicenna is symbolic recital; Rūzbihān is self-reported visionary autobiography.

With Rūmī / ʿAṭṭār

Overlap: beauty, love, symbolic intensity.
Difference: Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār teach through poetic parable; Rūzbihān speaks as a visionary witness.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better later source
Systematic angelology	Avicenna / Suhrawardī
Light metaphysics	Suhrawardī
Divine-name structure	Ibn ʿArabī’s Fuṣūṣ
Practice and dhikr method	Najm al-Dīn Kubrā
Initiatory animal parable	ʿAṭṭār
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
Broad poetic teaching	Rūmī
Compact symbolic metaphysics	Shabistarī
13. Variety review

This source adds a new mode to the sequence:

Prior source type	Rūzbihān’s contrast
Corbinian commentary	First-person visionary diary
Avicennan recital	Autobiographical unveiling
Suhrawardian philosophy	Sensory ecstasy and beauty
Ibn ʿArabī metaphysics	Personal visionary overwhelm
ʿAṭṭār allegory	Testimony rather than parable
Futūḥāt encyclopedic universe	Intimate saintly self-narration

This means Rūzbihān is not redundant. He supplies the missing ecstatic testimonial voice.

14. Balance review

This source needs two simultaneous readings:

Sympathetic reading

Rūzbihān is a major witness to the lived force of unveiling, divine beauty, angelic encounter, and ecstatic speech.

Critical reading

The text is also a literary self-presentation. The visionary does not simply “report experiences”; he organizes them into a sanctified life story.

The companion must preserve both:

the intensity of the visions
the rhetorical construction of sainthood

Without the first, it becomes dry scholarship.
Without the second, it becomes gullible mysticism.

15. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Visionary Diary / Source Frame

Use first.

Target:

Ernst public description
Accessing Muslim Lives public excerpt
biographical summaries
work as first-person visionary autobiography
Pack 2 — Childhood and Desert

Use second.

Target:

visions at ages three, seven, fifteen
departure from Fasa
desert retreat
first unveilings
Pack 3 — Beauty

Use third.

Target:

divine beauty
fragrance
beautiful face
sweet voice
moral beautification
“God is beautiful and loves beauty” frame
Pack 4 — Visionary Assembly

Use fourth.

Target:

God
angels
prophets
Sufi saints
transhistorical imaginal community
Pack 5 — Ecstatic Speech

Use fifth.

Target:

shath
Hallāj
defense of ecstatic utterance
dangerous speech under unveiling
16. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: visionary autobiography and sainthood
The Visionary Diary as Spiritual Evidence
Childhood Ecstasy and the First Unveilings
The Desert as a Machine of Unveiling
Beauty Is a Theophany
Angels, Prophets, and Saints in the Visionary Assembly
Ecstatic Speech and the Danger of Saying Too Much
Rhetoric of Sainthood
Rūzbihān After Ibn ʿArabī: Theophany as Sensory Overwhelm
Bridge note: Rūzbihān → Kubrā, from ecstatic vision to disciplined light-phenomenology
17. Final verdict

Rūzbihān Baqlī is the correct sixth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal is not only a metaphysical world, a symbolic geography, or a poetic map. It can erupt as first-person overwhelming disclosure: childhood ecstasy, desert unveiling, angelic and prophetic encounter, fragrance, face, voice, beauty, saintly speech, and the dangerous pressure of saying what ordinary language cannot contain.

Use this source as the project’s visionary autobiography / divine beauty / ecstatic testimony engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 7: Najm al-Dīn Kubrā — Adab al-Sulūk and Kubrawī Visionary Light Material
1. Source identity

Primary figure: Najm al-Dīn Kubrā, 1145–1221, founder of the Kubrawiyya order. He is remembered as a major Central Asian Sufi master and as a pioneer of Sufi analysis of dreams, visions, luminous epiphanies, images, and subtle centres.

Core source base:
Najm al-Dīn Kubrā, Adab al-Sulūk ilā Ḥaḍrat Mālik al-Mulūk, translated as Adab al-Suluk: A Treatise on Spiritual Wayfaring. A public English version is available through Al-Islam.org, which describes it as a translation of one of Kubrā’s Arabic treatises on esoteric wayfaring.

Supplementary Kubrawī source cluster:

Fawāʾiḥ al-Jamāl wa-Fawātiḥ al-Jalāl / The Fragrances of Beauty and the Openings of Majesty — important for visionary light phenomenology.
Later Kubrawī colour systems, especially in ʿAlāʾ al-Dawla Simnānī.
Scholarly material on dhikr, colour, synaesthesia, and early Kubrawī vision theory.

Copyright/public-access caution:
Adab al-Sulūk is publicly available online and can be used as the main working base. Other Kubrawī light materials are more scattered; use public summaries, academic articles, public PDFs, and careful paraphrase. Avoid treating later Simnānī colour maps as if they were all already fully present in Kubrā.

Text type: practical wayfaring manual + visionary phenomenology + subtle-body/light tradition.

Extraction mode:
Use Adab al-Sulūk for concrete practice structure. Use Kubrawī light/colour material as a linked phenomenological dossier.

2. Why this source comes seventh

The sequence so far has built:

Earlier source	Core gift
Avicenna / Corbin	Angel-guide and imaginal geography
Suhrawardī	Light ontology
Ibn ʿArabī, Fuṣūṣ	Divine-name manifestation
ʿAṭṭār	Bird-soul typology and initiatory unmaking
Ibn ʿArabī, Futūḥāt	Barzakh, dreams, body of light
Rūzbihān	First-person ecstatic vision and divine beauty

Kubrā now adds the missing practical-phenomenological layer:

What actually happens in the wayfarer’s perception as dhikr, discipline, retreat, and purification begin to alter the inner field?

This is the first source in the queue that can become a manual of visionary discernment: veils, darkness, lights, colours, subtle centres, dhikr, altered perception, and the danger of confusing any passing image with realization.

3. Master structural reading

Read Kubrā through two linked lenses:

Lens 1 — Wayfaring as removal of veils

Al-Islam.org says Adab al-Sulūk concerns the journey toward God through removal of “the veils of negligence” and “the veils of distance and darkness.” It also distinguishes inward esoteric wayfaring from outward travel.

So the basic structure is:

ordinary negligence
veils of darkness
disciplined wayfaring
remembrance / dhikr
purification of perception
unveiling of lights
discernment of states
arrival / nearness
Lens 2 — Visionary perception as diagnosable phenomenon

Kubrā is not merely saying “visions happen.” The Kubrawī tradition develops a science of inner phenomena: colour, light, dream, image, subtle centres, and spiritual perception. A public summary states that Kubrā’s works discuss dreams and visions, degrees of luminous epiphany, images that occupy the mystic’s attention, and the interrelations of subtle centres.

This makes him essential for Imaginarium because he gives a phenomenological bridge between:

practice → perception → colour/light → subtle organ → spiritual diagnosis

4. Part / source map
A. Adab al-Sulūk
Source section / theme	Function
Inward journey vs outward journey	Distinguishes spiritual travel from geographical travel.
Removal of veils	Core purification frame.
Negligence	Ordinary consciousness as forgetful opacity.
Distance and darkness	Experiential separation from the Real.
Rules of wayfaring	Practical discipline, not abstract metaphysics.
Conduct of the seeker	Adab as container for visionary experience.
Orientation toward God	Prevents fascination with visions as an end in themselves.
B. Fawāʾiḥ al-Jamāl wa-Fawātiḥ al-Jalāl
Theme	Function
Beauty and majesty	Links Rūzbihān’s beauty with Kubrā’s disciplined visionary register.
Luminous epiphany	Concrete visionary lights.
Image-classes	Distinguishing forms that appear inwardly.
Dream / vision interpretation	Discernment of inner images.
Subtle centres	Organs of visionary perception.
C. Early Kubrawī colour / dhikr scholarship
Source	Function
Abuali, “Words Clothed in Light”	Shows early Kubrawī connection between dhikr, sound, colour, and vision. The abstract states that recollection facilitates and induces perception of coloured lights.
UU public PDF
Useful scholarly support for colour/synaesthesia framing.
Later Simnānī material	Use cautiously as development of Kubrawī line, not identical with Kubrā.
5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Source area	Imaginarium function
Inward journey	Turns “journey” into practice, not just image.
Veils of negligence	Maps ordinary consciousness as forgetful rendering.
Veils of darkness	Gives a phenomenology of opacity, heaviness, obscuration.
Dhikr / recollection	Practice that reorders perception.
Adab	Ethical/spiritual container for altered states.
Luminous epiphanies	Inner lights as diagnostic phenomena.
Coloured lights	Concrete subtle perception; must not be generic aura talk.
Subtle centres	Organs of perception; bridge to latāʾif/chakra/sefirot comparative work later.
Dreams and visions	Structured data, not random fantasy.
Beauty and majesty	Twin modes of disclosure: attractive / overwhelming.
Discernment	Distinguishing true opening from distraction, inflation, or image-fascination.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Wayfaring as Removal of Veils

This is the main Adab al-Sulūk cluster. The path begins not by “adding experiences,” but by removing negligence, distance, and darkness.

Use for:

deconditioning
purification
practice as re-rendering
ordinary perception as veiled
opacity / darkness
Cluster B — Dhikr as Perceptual Technology

Dhikr is not just devotional repetition. In Kubrawī material, remembrance is linked to perceptual change: sound, word, colour, light, and inward seeing.

Use for:

mantra / repetition comparison
sound-light relation
synaesthesia
practice-induced vision
disciplined active imagination
Cluster C — Coloured Lights

This is the signature Kubrawī contribution.

Do not flatten it into “pretty colours.” The colours are signs in a developing inner field, tied to state, organ, purification, and spiritual diagnosis.

Use for:

light phenomenology
subtle anatomy
practice criteria
visionary discrimination
inner visual field
Cluster D — Subtle Centres as Organs of Vision

Kubrā and later Kubrawīs give a basis for discussing latāʾif not as abstract “chakras,” but as organs through which different lights and images become visible.

Use for:

subtle organ theory
embodied perception
soul anatomy
future comparative work with chakras/sefirot
inner sense organs
Cluster E — Dreams and Images as Diagnostic

Dreams, images, and visions are not automatically revelation. They require interpretation and discrimination.

Use for:

dream temple work
active imagination criteria
image taxonomy
spiritual discernment
avoiding visionary slop
Cluster F — Beauty and Majesty

This links Rūzbihān to Kubrā. Beauty attracts, Majesty overwhelms. The wayfarer must learn both.

Use for:

jamāl / jalāl
affective polarity
attraction and awe
vision as pressure
balanced spiritual perception
Cluster G — The Manufacturer of Saints

Kubrā’s epithet “walī-tarāsh,” often rendered “manufacturer of saints,” is important. It frames him as a trainer of realized people, not merely a theorist.

Use for:

lineage technology
teacher as transformer
saint-making discipline
practical Sufi laboratory
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “Wayfaring Begins by Removing the Veils”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Adab al-Sulūk, opening frame: inward journey, veils of negligence, distance, darkness.
Function: Establish Kubrā’s path as purification of perception.

Essay 2 — “Dhikr as a Technology of Light”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Adab al-Sulūk + Abuali on dhikr, colour, synaesthesia.
Function: Show remembrance as practice that reorganizes the perceptual field.

Essay 3 — “The Coloured Lights of the Wayfarer”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Kubrawī visionary material, Fawāʾiḥ, later Simnānī as cautious comparison.
Function: Core Kubrawī essay: lights as diagnostic signs.

Essay 4 — “Subtle Centres as Organs of Vision”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Kubrawī subtle-centre summaries + later colour systems.
Function: Build latāʾif / organ-of-perception framework.

Essay 5 — “Dreams, Images, and the Discipline of Discernment”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Kubrā on dreams/visions/images; public summaries.
Function: Prevent imaginal practice from becoming fantasy-chasing.

Essay 6 — “Beauty and Majesty: The Two Pressures of Disclosure”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Fawāʾiḥ al-Jamāl wa-Fawātiḥ al-Jalāl title/theme + Rūzbihān bridge.
Function: Show jamāl and jalāl as modes of visionary pressure.

Essay 7 — “The Manufacturer of Saints”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Kubrā biography + order formation + training lineage.
Function: Teacher as maker of organs, not dispenser of information.

Essay 8 — “From Suhrawardī’s Light to Kubrā’s Lights”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Suhrawardī light ontology + Kubrawī colour phenomenology.
Function: Cross-source bridge: metaphysical light becomes phenomenological lights.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / public base	Use
Adab Pack	Al-Islam.org Adab al-Sulūk	Wayfaring / veils essay
Dhikr-Light Pack	Abuali article + UU PDF	Dhikr as sound-colour-light practice
Coloured Lights Pack	Kubrā / Kubrawī visionary summaries	Colour phenomenology essay
Subtle Centres Pack	summaries on subtle centres and later Simnānī	Organs of perception essay
Dream-Vision Pack	public summary of Kubrā on dreams and images	Discernment essay
Jamāl-Jalāl Pack	Fawāʾiḥ al-Jamāl wa-Fawātiḥ al-Jalāl title/theme	Beauty/majesty essay
Saint-Maker Pack	biography: Kubrā as walī-tarāsh	Teacher/lineage essay
Bridge Pack	Suhrawardī + Kubrā	Light ontology to light phenomenology
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Practical wayfaring	5/5	Strongest source so far for disciplined path structure.
Dhikr	5/5	Key practice engine.
Coloured lights	5/5	Signature Kubrawī contribution.
Subtle centres	5/5	Essential for latāʾif / organ theory.
Visionary discernment	5/5	Strong practical value.
Dream / image analysis	4/5	Strong, though scattered in public sources.
Light ontology	3/5	Suhrawardī stronger metaphysically.
Divine beauty	3/5	Rūzbihān stronger; Kubrā adds disciplined polarity.
Poetic pedagogy	1/5	Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār stronger.
Public accessibility	4/5	Adab is accessible; full light treatises less clean.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Dhikr from Coloured Lights.

They are causally linked but need different essays:

dhikr = practice mechanism
coloured lights = visionary data
Split

Split Subtle Centres from Coloured Lights.

Colours are phenomena. Subtle centres are organs/locations/capacities. Do not merge them too early.

Merge

Merge dreams, images, and discernment into one essay.

This keeps the practical diagnostic focus.

Delay

Delay later Simnānī colour systems until after Kubrā’s own material is established. Use Simnānī as lineage development, not as a substitute for Kubrā.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

veils of negligence
veils of distance and darkness
inward journey vs physical journey
dhikr producing coloured lights
sound becoming light
subtle centres as organs
dreams and images requiring analysis
jamāl and jalāl
“manufacturer of saints”
death resisting the Mongol invasion, if used biographically, but do not sensationalize it
11. Overlap warnings
With Suhrawardī

Overlap: light, illumination, inner seeing.
Difference: Suhrawardī gives light ontology; Kubrā gives light phenomenology and practice.

With Ibn ʿArabī’s Futūḥāt

Overlap: dreams, imagination, practice, discernment.
Difference: Futūḥāt gives barzakh cosmology; Kubrā gives colour/light phenomenology and dhikr-based inner perception.

With Rūzbihān

Overlap: beauty, visions, ecstatic perception.
Difference: Rūzbihān is autobiographical overwhelm; Kubrā is disciplined training and diagnostic vision.

With Avicenna / Corbin

Overlap: veils, angelic/soul journey, imaginal perception.
Difference: Avicenna gives symbolic geography; Kubrā gives practical inward rules and phenomenology.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Full divine-name metaphysics	Ibn ʿArabī, Fuṣūṣ
Angelic hierarchy	Avicenna / Suhrawardī
Poetic initiatory narrative	ʿAṭṭār
First-person ecstatic diary	Rūzbihān
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
Broad parable pedagogy	Rūmī
Compact metaphysical poetry	Shabistarī
13. Variety review

Kubrā adds something the earlier sources did not fully provide:

Prior source type	Kubrā’s addition
Corbin / Avicenna	From symbolic journey to practical inward wayfaring
Suhrawardī	From metaphysical light to perceived coloured lights
Ibn ʿArabī	From barzakh theory to diagnostic visionary practice
ʿAṭṭār	From poetic path to disciplined path
Rūzbihān	From ecstatic testimony to trained discernment

This makes Kubrā crucial for the project’s practice layer.

14. Balance review

The companion must avoid two mistakes:

Mistake 1 — Making Kubrā into generic chakra mysticism

The colour and subtle-centre material must remain Islamic, Kubrawī, dhikr-based, and tied to adab.

Mistake 2 — Making Kubrā merely academic

This source is valuable precisely because it treats inner lights and visions as practice-relevant data.

The correct balance:

disciplined practice, careful phenomenology, and sober interpretation of visionary light.

15. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Adab al-Sulūk / Wayfaring

Use first.

Target:

inward journey
veils of negligence
veils of distance and darkness
conduct of the wayfarer
adab as container
Pack 2 — Dhikr and Light

Use second.

Target:

recollection
sound
word
colour
light
synaesthesia
Pack 3 — Coloured Lights

Use third.

Target:

luminous epiphany
degrees of lights
colour as diagnostic sign
later Kubrawī development
Pack 4 — Subtle Centres

Use fourth.

Target:

latāʾif
inner organs
perception through centres
careful comparison to chakras/sefirot later
Pack 5 — Dreams / Images / Discernment

Use fifth.

Target:

dreams
visionary images
classes of images
true disclosure vs distraction
16. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: wayfaring and visionary phenomenology
Wayfaring Begins by Removing the Veils
Dhikr as a Technology of Light
The Coloured Lights of the Wayfarer
Subtle Centres as Organs of Vision
Dreams, Images, and the Discipline of Discernment
Beauty and Majesty: The Two Pressures of Disclosure
The Manufacturer of Saints
From Suhrawardī’s Light to Kubrā’s Lights
Bridge note: Kubrā → al-Niffarī, from visionary phenomena to apophatic address
17. Final verdict

Najm al-Dīn Kubrā is the correct seventh source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

Visionary experience can be trained, purified, and discriminated. The wayfarer removes veils of negligence, distance, and darkness; dhikr reorganizes perception; coloured lights appear as signs in the inner field; subtle centres become organs of vision; dreams and images require interpretation; beauty and majesty pressure the soul in different ways.

Use this source as the project’s disciplined visionary phenomenology / dhikr-light / subtle-centre engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 8: al-Niffarī — Kitāb al-Mawāqif and Kitāb al-Mukhāṭabāt
1. Source identity

Primary source: Muḥammad ibn ʿAbd al-Jabbār al-Niffarī, Kitāb al-Mawāqif / The Book of Spiritual Standings or Stayings, and Kitāb al-Mukhāṭabāt / The Book of Divine Addresses.

Best-known English edition: A. J. Arberry, The Mawāqif and Mukhaṭabāt of Muḥammad ibn ʿAbdi’l-Jabbār al-Niffarī, first published in 1935 by Gibb Memorial Trust / Luzac. WorldCat lists the 1935 edition as edited with translation, commentary, and indices by Arberry.

Chisholme also identifies Arberry’s translation as the best-known English version. Public-access situation: Full scans and transcriptions circulate online, but many are hosted on unstable or copyright-unclear sites. Use extensive summation, table-of-contents mapping, short excerpts only, and public scholarly summaries. A Scribd preview gives a useful contents list for many Mawāqif, but do not rely on it for long quotation.

Text type: apophatic mystical address; fragmentary divine speech; Sufi “standing” text; non-systematic visionary theology.

Extraction mode:
Use structural summation and section-location mapping. This is not a quote-mining source. It is a source for stance, voice, apophasis, bewilderment, and the terrifying intimacy of divine address.

2. Why this source comes eighth

The sequence so far built:

Earlier source	Core gift
Avicenna / Corbin	Angel-guide, Orient/Occident, visionary recital
Suhrawardī	Light ontology and presential knowledge
Ibn ʿArabī, Fuṣūṣ	Divine names, prophetic manifestation
ʿAṭṭār	Bird-soul typology and annihilating journey
Ibn ʿArabī, Futūḥāt	Barzakh, dreams, body of light, spiritual practice
Rūzbihān	Ecstatic first-person visionary testimony
Kubrā	Disciplined visionary phenomenology, dhikr, colours, subtle centres

al-Niffarī now adds the missing apophatic address:

not journey, not system, not beauty, not light-phenomenology — but being made to stand before the Real until speech, knowledge, selfhood, and spiritual confidence are broken.

This is where Imaginarium gets its strongest source for bewilderment, non-conceptual encounter, divine speech, and the limits of mystical language.

3. Master structural reading

Read al-Niffarī as a text of arrested encounter.

The recurring formula is:

“He made me stand…”

The divine does not merely reveal information. It stations the servant before a truth, a sea, a veil, a light, a command, a silence, a bewilderment.

A recent scholarly article describes the Kitāb al-Mawāqif as a tenth-century Sufi text where fanāʾ means speaking from a kind of “non-perspective,” a theological paradox that Sufi literature handles creatively.

Another scholarly summary notes that al-Niffarī’s works are marked by direct dialogue between God and the mystic, where divine definitions of Sufi and Islamic values are transmitted through the mystic.

So the text’s basic engine is:

standing — the servant is halted.
address — God speaks.
unmaking — concepts fail.
bewilderment — the servant cannot resolve the encounter.
gnosis beyond possession — knowledge becomes exposure, not control.
return to speech — the text records what cannot really be contained in speech.
4. Part / work map
A. Kitāb al-Mawāqif / The Book of Spiritual Standings

The Mawāqif are station-texts. Each “standing” gives a title and a compressed divine address.

A public contents preview lists early sections including:

Mawqif of Glory
Mawqif of Nearness
Mawqif of His Majesty
Mawqif of the Sea
Mawqif of Compassionateness
Mawqif of Staying
Mawqif of the Gnosis of Gnoses
Mawqif of Works
Mawqif of Command
Mawqif of Mystical Perception
Mawqif of Death
Mawqif of the Veil of Vision
Mawqif of Insight
Mawqif of the Ineffable
Mawqif Beyond the Stayings
Mawqif of a Light
Mawqif before Him
Mawqif of “Who art thou and who am I”
Mawqif of Oneness
Mawqif of Night
Mawqif of Revealing and Perplexity
Mawqif of Servanthood
Mawqif of “Stay”

These titles alone are extremely useful for passage-pack architecture.

B. Kitāb al-Mukhāṭabāt / The Book of Addresses

The Mukhāṭabāt are direct divine addresses. They are less “stationed” as titled halts and more like compressed summons, warnings, and revelations.

Use them for:

divine speech
address without narrative
second-person spiritual pressure
language of command
the stripping of devotional self-image
C. Other fragments

Arberry’s edition includes other fragments, according to OpenLibrary and WorldCat records.

Use fragments only after the core Mawāqif and Mukhāṭabāt architecture is established.

5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Section / title cluster	Imaginarium function
Glory / Majesty	Divine overwhelming; not beauty but pressure.
Nearness	The danger of intimacy with the Real.
Sea	Non-containment, drowning of concepts, measureless presence.
Staying / “Stay”	Spiritual arrest; the command to remain before what cannot be resolved.
Gnosis of Gnoses	Knowledge beyond ordinary knowing.
Works	Limits of action and devotional achievement.
Command	Divine imperative; not personal preference.
Mystical Perception	Seeing without possession.
Death	Fanāʾ, extinction, ego-loss in theological register.
Veil / Veil of Vision	Even vision can veil. Very important.
Insight	Seeing into what cannot become an object.
Ineffable	Language at its limit.
Beyond the Stayings	Transcending even the stations of encounter.
Light	Not Suhrawardī’s ontological light, but address-light, exposure-light.
“Who art thou and who am I”	Shattering of identity relation.
Oneness	Unity beyond conceptual monism.
Night	Obscurity, concealment, hidden intimacy.
Revealing and Perplexity	Disclosure that increases bewilderment rather than resolving it.
Servanthood	The servant stripped of spiritual ownership.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Standing

The signature term. A “standing” is not a station one acquires; it is a condition in which the servant is halted by God.

Use for:

spiritual arrest
silence
exposure
direct encounter
non-progressive mysticism
Cluster B — Divine Address

This is the strongest address-source in the queue. God speaks directly in imperative, paradox, negation, and intimacy.

Use for:

second-person sacred writing
command
summons
prophetic pressure without prophecy
rhetoric of immediacy
Cluster C — Bewilderment / Perplexity

Niffarī is essential for hayra: not confusion as ignorance, but bewilderment as the mind’s defeat before the Real.

Use for:

anti-system mysticism
collapse of conceptual closure
productive not-knowing
apophatic gnosis
Cluster D — Vision as Veil

This is one of the most important Imaginarium correctives.

After Kubrā’s lights and Rūzbihān’s visions, al-Niffarī says: even vision may become a veil.

Use for:

anti-visionary inflation
discernment
warning against aesthetic mysticism
critique of image-fascination
Cluster E — The Sea

The Sea is one of the great Niffarī images: vastness, ungraspability, drowning, measurelessness.

Use for:

non-containment
annihilation
divine immensity
oceanic but not sentimental mysticism
Cluster F — Servanthood

Niffarī’s servanthood is stripped of self-congratulation. The servant cannot possess nearness, gnosis, works, vision, or annihilation.

Use for:

humility
anti-ego spirituality
surrender
loss of spiritual identity
Cluster G — Beyond the Stations

The text destabilizes even its own structure. There is a Mawqif “Beyond the Stayings,” which means the “station” cannot become a final map.

Use for:

anti-map warning
beyond-stage models
refusal of spiritual checklist systems
final destabilization of source-companion architecture
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “He Made Me Stand”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: opening Mawāqif formula; Glory, Nearness, Staying, Stay.
Function: Establish the core concept of spiritual standing as divine arrest.

Essay 2 — “Divine Address and the End of Self-Narration”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Mukhāṭabāt + command/second-person sections.
Function: Show what happens when the mystic stops narrating and becomes addressed.

Essay 3 — “Bewilderment Is Higher Than Clarity”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Revealing and Perplexity; Ineffable; Beyond the Stayings.
Function: Build Imaginarium’s apophatic epistemology.

Essay 4 — “The Veil of Vision”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Veil of Vision; Veil; Mystical Perception; Insight.
Function: Crucial warning essay after Kubrā and Rūzbihān: imaginal seeing can become bondage.

Essay 5 — “The Sea That Cannot Be Crossed”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Mawqif of the Sea; Mawqif of a Sea.
Function: Divine immensity and uncontainability.

Essay 6 — “Servanthood Without Possession”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Servanthood; Works; Command; Nearness.
Function: Spiritual identity stripped of ownership.

Essay 7 — “Who Art Thou and Who Am I?”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Mawqif of “Who art thou and who am I”; Oneness; Reality/Gnosis sections.
Function: Identity rupture without easy nondual slogans.

Essay 8 — “Beyond the Stayings”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Mawqif Beyond the Stayings.
Function: Meta-essay: no map survives the Real, including the map of mystical stations.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / public base	Use
Standing Pack	Glory, Nearness, Staying, “Stay”	“He Made Me Stand”
Address Pack	Mukhāṭabāt, Command, Admonition	Divine address essay
Bewilderment Pack	Ineffable, Revealing and Perplexity, Beyond Stayings	Apophatic epistemology
Vision-Veil Pack	Veil of Vision, Mystical Perception, Insight, Veil	Anti-inflation essay
Sea Pack	Mawqif of the Sea; Mawqif of a Sea	Immensity / non-containment
Servanthood Pack	Servanthood, Works, Command, Conduct of Saints	Humility / surrender
Identity Pack	“Who art thou and who am I,” Oneness, Reality/Gnosis	Identity rupture
Night Pack	Night, Hiddenness, Presence-chamber	Dark intimacy essay
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Apophatic address	5/5	Strongest source in queue.
Bewilderment	5/5	Core Niffarī contribution.
Direct divine speech	5/5	Signature mode.
Fanāʾ / annihilation	5/5	Dense, paradoxical, non-perspectival.
Anti-visionary corrective	5/5	“Veil of Vision” is crucial.
Imaginal geography	2/5	More existential than spatial.
Angelology	1/5	Not the point.
Light phenomenology	2/5	Light appears, but not like Suhrawardī/Kubrā.
Practice method	2/5	No systematic manual.
Public accessibility	3/5	Edition metadata and contents are public; full text access/copyright unclear.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Standing from Address.

They are linked but not identical:

standing = being stationed before the Real.
address = what is spoken from that impossible nearness.
Split

Split Bewilderment from Ineffability.

Bewilderment is the lived cognitive state.
Ineffability is the failure of language.

Merge

Merge Works / Command / Servanthood into one essay on spiritual non-possession.

Delay

Delay Oneness until after bewilderment. Otherwise it will become a cheap nondual slogan.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

“He made me stand”
Mawqif of the Sea
Mawqif of Night
Mawqif of the Veil of Vision
Mawqif of Revealing and Perplexity
Mawqif of “Who art thou and who am I”
Mawqif Beyond the Stayings
direct second-person address
“Stay”
the servant unable to possess even gnosis
11. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: divine speech, gnosis, oneness, fanāʾ.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī builds metaphysical architecture; al-Niffarī interrupts architecture through direct address.

With Rūzbihān

Overlap: ecstatic intensity, divine encounter.
Difference: Rūzbihān narrates visionary experience; al-Niffarī records being addressed beyond narration.

With Kubrā

Overlap: vision, unveiling, discernment.
Difference: Kubrā trains perception; al-Niffarī warns that even vision can veil.

With ʿAṭṭār

Overlap: annihilation, bewilderment, loss of self.
Difference: ʿAṭṭār dramatizes through journey; al-Niffarī arrests the seeker in naked address.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Symbolic animals / parable	ʿAṭṭār, Rūmī
Angelic hierarchy	Avicenna, Suhrawardī
Divine-name metaphysics	Ibn ʿArabī’s Fuṣūṣ
Practical dhikr and subtle lights	Kubrā
First-person visionary beauty	Rūzbihān
Broad teaching stories	Rūmī
Compact symbolic metaphysics	Shabistarī
13. Variety review

al-Niffarī adds a new mode:

Prior mode	al-Niffarī’s difference
Visionary recital	No journey, only standing
Light ontology	No system, only address
Prophetic metaphysics	No architecture, only destabilization
Bird allegory	No narrative, only exposure
Barzakh practice ecology	No field manual, only direct command
Visionary autobiography	No self-story, only the self being undone
Kubrawī phenomenology	No diagnostic map, only the warning that vision itself can veil

This source is necessary because it prevents the whole Imaginarium project from becoming too image-rich, system-rich, or experience-hungry.

14. Balance review

The companion must avoid two errors:

Error 1 — Turning al-Niffarī into slogans

His fragments are short and aphoristic, but they are not motivational quotes. They are pressure-events.

Error 2 — Treating apophasis as vague mystery

Niffarī’s negations are precise. Each standing strips a particular form of possession: works, knowledge, vision, nearness, identity, even mystical station.

Correct balance:

He is not anti-knowledge. He is against possessed knowledge.
He is not anti-vision. He is against vision as veil.
He is not anti-path. He is against turning the path into ownership.

15. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Standing

Use first.

Target:

Glory
Nearness
Staying
“Stay”
the repeated formula of being made to stand
Pack 2 — Address

Use second.

Target:

Mukhāṭabāt
Command
Admonition
divine second-person speech
Pack 3 — Bewilderment

Use third.

Target:

Ineffable
Revealing and Perplexity
Beyond Stayings
Reality / Gnosis
Pack 4 — Vision as Veil

Use fourth.

Target:

Veil of Vision
Mystical Perception
Insight
Veil
Pack 5 — Sea / Night

Use fifth.

Target:

Sea
a Sea
Night
hidden presence
dark intimacy
16. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: standing, address, bewilderment
He Made Me Stand
Divine Address and the End of Self-Narration
Bewilderment Is Higher Than Clarity
The Veil of Vision
The Sea That Cannot Be Crossed
Servanthood Without Possession
Who Art Thou and Who Am I?
Beyond the Stayings
Bridge note: al-Niffarī → Rūmī, from apophatic pressure to parabolic teaching
17. Final verdict

al-Niffarī is the correct eighth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal path must eventually be stripped of its images. The seeker is made to stand before the Real; God addresses him without intermediary; knowledge becomes bewilderment; vision becomes a possible veil; nearness cannot be possessed; the sea cannot be crossed by concepts; even mystical stations must be surpassed.

Use this source as the project’s apophatic address / bewilderment / anti-visionary-inflation engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 9: Jalāl al-Dīn Rūmī — selected Masnavī-yi Maʿnavī
1. Source identity

Primary source: Jalāl al-Dīn Rūmī, Masnavī-yi Maʿnavī, usually translated as The Masnavi, Mathnawi, or Spiritual Couplets.

Best public-access base: R. A. Nicholson’s classic translation and edition is available in public scans through Internet Archive; Vol. 2 is explicitly marked “Out_of_copyright” by its archive metadata.

Wikisource also hosts Whinfield’s public-domain abridged Masnavi I Ma’navi.

Copyright caution: Modern translations, including Oxford / Penguin / popular poetic versions, are copyrighted. Use Nicholson or Whinfield for public-domain passage work; use modern scholarship for structure only.

Text type: didactic Sufi poetic epic; parable-chain; anti-literalist imaginal pedagogy; prophetic-animal-human story machine.

Extraction mode:
Use focused public-domain passage packs, not the whole six-book ocean. The Masnavī is huge: public summaries describe it as six books, roughly 25,000 verses / 50,000 lines.

2. Why this source comes ninth

The previous sources gave doctrine, light, barzakh, visionary autobiography, colour-phenomenology, and apophatic address. Rūmī gives the missing teaching machine.

His contribution is:

The parable itself becomes an imaginal method.
A donkey, parrot, merchant, reed, prophet, king, slave-girl, lion, fox, chickpea, elephant, or candle can suddenly become the whole cosmos teaching itself.

The Masnavī is not systematic like Ibn ʿArabī, not architecturally concentrated like ʿAṭṭār, and not apophatically naked like al-Niffarī. It is a living field of stories, interruptions, reversals, jokes, Qurʾānic echoes, animals, prophets, tradesmen, fools, saints, and sudden mystical eruptions.

3. Master structural reading

The Masnavī should be treated as anti-literal pedagogy.

Its basic rhythm:

A story begins plainly.
Characters act from ordinary motives.
Rūmī interrupts himself.
The story opens into Qurʾān, hadith, animal speech, psychology, cosmology, or love.
The literal surface breaks.
The reader is forced to reread the scene symbolically.
The narrative may never “close” in ordinary terms.

Public summaries note that the Masnavī has no single framed plot and uses many voices: authorial teaching, storytelling, analogy, dialogue, moral reflection, spiritual discourse, and sudden hiatus.

So the companion should not map every story. It should build high-yield parable clusters.

4. Six-book map
Book	Function for Imaginarium
Book I	Opening reed, separation, longing, king/slave-girl, merchant/parrot, lion/hare: foundational pedagogy of desire, loss, cunning, image, and release.
Book II	Deeper moral psychology: ego tricks, prophetic lessons, animal fables, reversal of worldly intelligence.
Book III	Knowledge, Moses material, teacher-student reversals, limits of reason.
Book IV	More advanced spiritual psychology: form/meaning, hidden wisdom, reversals of status.
Book V	Law/path/truth relation; public scanned text says Book V begins by comparing religious law to a candle showing the way.
Book VI	Late synthesis, unfinished movement, final teaching intensification.
A public summary notes that the six books are often grouped in pairs: Books I–II around the lower self and self-deception; Books III–IV around reason and knowledge; Books V–VI around denying merely physical existence to understand God’s existence.
5. Chapter / story function map
Story / motif	Function
Reed flute	Separation, longing, breath, voice as wound.
King and slave-girl	Love, illness, hidden diagnosis, divine physician.
Merchant and parrot	Captivity, imitation, death-feint, liberation.
Lion and hare	Cunning intelligence defeating brute force; reflection in the well.
Elephant in the dark	Partial perception mistaken for whole truth.
Moses and shepherd	Love’s speech beyond formal correctness.
Chickpea in the pot	Cooking as transformation under heat.
Parrot and oil / bald head	Projection, false analogy, comic perception error.
Grammarian and boatman	Knowledge that cannot save in crisis.
Lion, wolf, and fox	Ego, rank, annihilation, survival through self-erasure.
Prophet stories	Prophetic form as teaching mirror.
Animal speech	Soul-parts speaking through creature forms.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Reed and the Wound of Separation

The reed is the correct opening Rūmī essay. It gives sound, breath, severance, longing, and the transformation of wound into music.

Use for:

breath / sound
exile
longing
voice
soul as instrument
art as wound speaking
Cluster B — Parable as Imaginal Pedagogy

Rūmī’s stories do not merely illustrate teachings. They transform perception by forcing reversals.

Use for:

symbolic literacy
anti-literal reading
teaching through interruption
story as spiritual technology
Cluster C — Animals as Soul-Functions

Rūmī’s animals are not “cute fables.” They are moving organs of the soul.

Use for:

animal-symbol atlas
fox/lion/hare/parrot/donkey/elephant
ego typology
concept-to-art mapping
Cluster D — Comic Misrecognition

Rūmī often uses jokes, errors, absurdity, and misperception to break seriousness.

Use for:

ego deflation
perception error
false analogy
spiritual comedy
anti-grandiosity
Cluster E — Prophetic Anti-Literalism

Stories like Moses and the shepherd are crucial: correct form can miss love; incorrect speech can be truer than polished doctrine.

Use for:

heart over formalism
symbolic flexibility
divine mercy
critique of spiritual policing
Cluster F — Cooking / Burning / Melting

Transformation is often bodily and domestic: chickpeas boil, bread bakes, wax melts, fire cooks.

Use for:

alchemical body
suffering as transformation
heat of practice
kitchen mysticism
embodiment
Cluster G — Knowledge That Fails

The grammarian and boatman cluster is essential: knowledge that cannot swim is useless at the moment of crossing.

Use for:

critique of conceptual mastery
practice over jargon
death / crossing
humbled intellect
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Reed: A Wound That Learned to Sing”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Book I opening reed passage, Nicholson or Whinfield.
Function: Establish separation, breath, voice, longing, and art.

Essay 2 — “Rūmī’s Stories Are Traps for Literal Mind”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: selected stories across Books I–II.
Function: Define parable as imaginal pedagogy.

Essay 3 — “The Merchant’s Parrot and the Secret of Liberation”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Book I merchant/parrot story.
Function: Captivity, imitation, symbolic death, freedom.

Essay 4 — “The Elephant in the Dark”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: elephant story.
Function: Partial perception, perspectival error, anti-dogmatism.

Essay 5 — “Moses and the Shepherd: When Wrong Words Are Right”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Moses/shepherd story.
Function: Love beyond formal correctness; divine acceptance of broken speech.

Essay 6 — “The Lion, the Hare, and the Well”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: lion/hare story.
Function: Reflection, cunning, egoic force, imaginal mirror.

Essay 7 — “The Chickpea in the Pot”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: chickpea story.
Function: Cooking as spiritual transformation.

Essay 8 — “Animals of the Soul”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: parrot, lion, hare, fox, donkey, elephant, wolf.
Function: Build Rūmī animal-symbol atlas for Imaginarium.

Essay 9 — “The Knowledge That Cannot Swim”

Target: 2,500–3,500 words
Source base: grammarian/boatman story.
Function: Critique of dry intellectualism.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Reed Pack	Book I prologue	Separation / voice essay
Merchant-Parrot Pack	Book I	Captivity / liberation
Elephant Pack	Book III or public abridged versions	Partial perception
Moses-Shepherd Pack	Book II	Anti-literal love
Lion-Hare Pack	Book I	Reflection / ego-force
Chickpea Pack	Book III	Cooking / transformation
Grammarian Pack	Book I	Knowledge vs crossing
Animal Atlas Pack	Across Books I–III	Symbol taxonomy
Law-Path-Truth Pack	Book V opening	Candle, law, way, truth
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Parable pedagogy	5/5	Strongest source in queue.
Symbolic animals	5/5	Excellent for art/concept mapping.
Anti-literal reading	5/5	Core Rūmī function.
Love and longing	5/5	Reed, Moses/shepherd, many stories.
Ego deflation	5/5	Comic and sharp.
Divine-name metaphysics	3/5	Present, but Ibn ʿArabī cleaner.
Angelology	1/5	Not central.
Light phenomenology	2/5	Suhrawardī/Kubrā stronger.
Practical wayfaring	3/5	Strong indirectly through stories.
Public accessibility	5/5	Nicholson/Whinfield public-domain bases are available.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Reed from general “love” material.

The reed is too foundational to bury. It defines Rūmī’s whole poetics of severance and song.

Split

Split Moses and Shepherd from generic anti-literalism.

It is the best concrete teaching for “wrong words can be spiritually right.”

Merge

Merge smaller animal stories into Animals of the Soul, while giving parrot, lion/hare, and elephant their own essays.

Delay

Delay Book V law/path/truth until after the reader has learned how Rūmī’s story-machine works.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

reed cut from reed-bed
merchant’s parrot pretending death
lion seeing reflection in well
elephant touched in darkness
shepherd’s improper love-speech
chickpea boiling in pot
grammarian unable to swim
fox surviving by self-erasure
law as candle showing the way
11. Overlap warnings
With ʿAṭṭār

Overlap: birds, animals, journey, annihilation.
Difference: ʿAṭṭār has one concentrated quest-frame; Rūmī is a sprawling parable engine.

With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: prophets, symbolic interpretation, form/meaning.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī builds metaphysics; Rūmī makes the reader undergo reversals through story.

With al-Niffarī

Overlap: anti-conceptualism, language limits.
Difference: al-Niffarī strips language; Rūmī multiplies stories until literalism collapses.

With Kubrā

Overlap: practical transformation and discernment.
Difference: Kubrā maps inner phenomena; Rūmī trains perception through jokes, animals, and narrative shocks.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Technical angelology	Avicenna / Suhrawardī
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Colour/light phenomenology	Kubrā
Divine-name architecture	Ibn ʿArabī
First-person visionary diary	Rūzbihān
Apophatic standing	al-Niffarī
Compact metaphysical poem-commentary	Shabistarī
13. Variety review

Rūmī adds the project’s broadest storytelling layer:

Prior source	Rūmī’s addition
Avicenna	From formal visionary recital to endless parable field
Suhrawardī	From light ontology to comic embodied teaching
Ibn ʿArabī	From metaphysical condensation to narrative reversal
ʿAṭṭār	From one bird epic to hundreds of micro-initiations
Kubrā	From disciplined vision to symbolic everyday pedagogy
al-Niffarī	From divine address to teaching through indirect story

This source is especially useful for the site because it supplies visual scenes: reeds, birds, kings, physicians, parrots, lions, wells, boats, elephants, kitchens, candles.

14. Balance review

The companion must avoid two mistakes:

Mistake 1 — Making Rūmī generic love poetry

Rūmī is not just inspirational romance. His stories are precise spiritual interventions.

Mistake 2 — Making every story mean the same thing

Each parable has a different function: diagnosis, reversal, ego-deflation, love, anti-literalism, practice, death, release.

Correct balance:

Rūmī’s tenderness is surgical. His comedy is metaphysical. His stories are not decorations; they are machines for changing how perception reads the world.

15. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Reed

Use first.

Target:

Book I opening
reed-bed separation
breath
song
wound as voice
Pack 2 — Merchant and Parrot

Use second.

Target:

captivity
message to India
death-feint
release
Pack 3 — Moses and Shepherd

Use third.

Target:

wrong speech
divine mercy
love beyond correctness
anti-spiritual-policing
Pack 4 — Elephant / Partial Perception

Use fourth.

Target:

dark room
hand touching part
mistaken totality
perspectival humility
Pack 5 — Animal Atlas

Use fifth.

Target:

lion
hare
fox
donkey
parrot
elephant
wolf
birds
16. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: Rūmī’s parable engine
The Reed: A Wound That Learned to Sing
Rūmī’s Stories Are Traps for Literal Mind
The Merchant’s Parrot and the Secret of Liberation
The Elephant in the Dark
Moses and the Shepherd: When Wrong Words Are Right
The Lion, the Hare, and the Well
The Chickpea in the Pot
Animals of the Soul
Bridge note: Rūmī → Shabistarī, from parable-field to compact symbolic metaphysics
17. Final verdict

Rūmī is the correct ninth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The world teaches through story. Ordinary scenes — a reed flute, a parrot in a cage, an elephant in the dark, a shepherd speaking wrongly, a lion staring into a well, a chickpea boiling in a pot — become imaginal machines that break literal perception and train the soul to read symbolically.

Use this source as the project’s parable / animal-symbol / anti-literal pedagogy engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 10: Maḥmūd Shabistarī — Gulshan-i Rāz / The Secret Rose Garden
1. Source identity

Primary source: Maḥmūd Shabistarī, Gulshan-i Rāz, usually translated as The Secret Rose Garden or The Mystic Rose Garden.

Core public editions:

Edition	Use
E. H. Whinfield, Gulshan i Raz: The Mystic Rose Garden, 1880	Best source because it includes Persian text, English translation, and notes chiefly from Muḥammad Lahījī’s commentary. Internet Archive has a scan.
Florence Lederer, The Secret Rose Garden, 1920
Public-domain poetic rendering; good for readable passages. Sacred Texts hosts it and says the poem was written as a reply to questions from a Sufi doctor of Herat.
Matheson Trust PDF of Whinfield
Useful public PDF, with Lahījī-based notes and Whinfield’s apparatus.
Copyright caution: Whinfield 1880 and Lederer 1920 are public-domain working bases. Avoid relying on modern Red Wheel/Weiser editions, which Google Books marks as copyright.

Text type: compact Persian Sufi metaphysical poem; question-answer treatise; symbol-compression manual.

Extraction mode: Use Whinfield/Lederer for public-domain passage packs, Lahījī notes for commentary, and summaries for structure.

2. Why this source comes tenth

After Rūmī’s sprawling parable-field, Shabistarī gives the opposite mode:

compressed metaphysical poetry.

This is the project’s best source for:

point and circle imagery
face, hair, mole, wine, idol, temple
human form as mirror
divine manifestation
symbolic condensation
question-answer metaphysics
poetic theology as diagram

The poem was completed around 1317 and is described by the Borges Center as one of the most important philosophical poems in Persian. It also notes that more than thirty commentaries exist, with Lahījī’s commentary the best known and the basis of Whinfield’s English version.

3. Master structural reading

Read Gulshan-i Rāz as a compressed Sufi metaphysical catechism.

It is not a narrative like ʿAṭṭār, not a parable ocean like Rūmī, not a visionary diary like Rūzbihān. It is a series of answers to doctrinal-symbolic questions.

Its engine:

A question is asked.
Shabistarī answers through compact metaphysical verse.
Ordinary religious/philosophical terms are re-read symbolically.
Human form, cosmos, beauty, wine, idol, and lover become metaphysical diagrams.
Lahījī’s commentary expands the compressed poem into a Sufi metaphysical system.
4. Part / question map

Build the source companion around these question-clusters:

Cluster	Function
Self and One	human identity, divine unity, the mirror problem
Thought / knowledge	limits of reason, true knowing
Spiritual journey	path, seeker, way, arrival
Time and dream-world	impermanence, appearance, world as dream
Human form	the face, body, heart, eye, beauty as theophany
Point and circle	unity becoming multiplicity, metaphysical geometry
Idol / temple / wine	scandalous symbols re-read through Sufi taʾwīl
Perfect human	human as comprehensive locus
Annihilation / subsistence	fanāʾ and baqāʾ in compact symbolic form
Epilogue / rose garden	poem as garden of hidden meanings
Google Books describes the work as treating themes including the Self and the One, the spiritual journey, time and this dream-world, and divine inebriation.
5. Chapter / section function map for Imaginarium
Source area	Imaginarium function
Rose garden	The whole poem as symbolic enclosure: each flower is a compressed secret.
Self and One	Nondual metaphysics without loose sloganizing.
Point	Undifferentiated source; origin of extension.
Circle	Manifestation, return, circumference, cosmic order.
Face	Divine beauty made visible.
Hair / curl	Multiplicity, veiling, entanglement of forms.
Mole	The hidden point in the field of beauty.
Eye	Perception, witness, divine seeing through the human.
Wine	ecstatic knowledge; inebriation beyond discursive control.
Idol / temple	scandal-symbols for manifestation and form.
Dream-world	appearance as real-enough-to-teach but not ultimate.
Perfect human	human form as total mirror.
Epilogue	The poem presents itself as a gathered posy from the rose garden.
6. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Point and the Circle

This is the most important Imaginarium cluster.

Use for:

diagrammatic metaphysics
unity and manifestation
source and circumference
symbol geometry
art layer / mandala layer
Cluster B — Human Form as Theophanic Diagram

Shabistarī makes the body symbolic: face, eye, hair, mole, lip, cheek.

Use for:

divine beauty
human image
subtle body
symbolic anatomy
Rūzbihān bridge
Cluster C — Wine, Idol, and Scandal-Symbols

The poem reinterprets forbidden or scandalous images as symbols of gnosis, form, attraction, and bewilderment.

Use for:

taʾwīl
anti-literalism
poetic shock
Sufi symbolic language
Cluster D — The World as Dream

This is useful for Imaginarium’s rendering model: world as appearance, sign, dream, and teaching-field.

Use for:

perception theory
dream ontology
symbolic realism
dependent appearance
Cluster E — Perfect Human

This links directly to Ibn ʿArabī.

Use for:

human as microcosm
divine names
mirror of totality
anthropocosmic form
Cluster F — Lahījī Commentary Layer

Lahījī is crucial because the poem is too compact on its own. Whinfield’s edition says its notes are chiefly from Lahījī’s commentary.

Use for:

rigorous expansion
commentary tradition
avoiding vague poetic interpretation
source-traceable metaphysical unpacking
7. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Rose Garden as a Map of Hidden Meanings”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: opening / epilogue; Whinfield and Lederer.
Function: Establish the poem as compressed symbolic garden.

Essay 2 — “The Point and the Circle”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Whinfield + Lahījī notes.
Function: Core metaphysical diagram essay.

Essay 3 — “The Human Face as Theophany”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: face, eye, hair, mole, beauty-symbol passages.
Function: Human form as divine manifestation.

Essay 4 — “Wine, Idol, and the Sufi Scandal of Symbols”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: wine/idol/temple passages.
Function: Anti-literal symbolic reading.

Essay 5 — “The World as Dream-Image”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: time, dream-world, appearance passages.
Function: Imaginarium rendering ontology.

Essay 6 — “The Perfect Human as the Total Mirror”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: human-form passages + Ibn ʿArabī bridge.
Function: Human as comprehensive locus of manifestation.

Essay 7 — “Lahījī Opens the Rose”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: Whinfield notes chiefly from Lahījī.
Function: Commentary as expansion of poetic compression.

Essay 8 — “From Rūmī’s Stories to Shabistarī’s Diagrams”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Bridge essay: sprawling parable-field becomes compact symbolic geometry.

8. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Rose Garden Pack	opening / epilogue	poem-as-garden essay
Point-Circle Pack	metaphysical geometry passages	core diagram essay
Face-Hair-Mole Pack	beauty-symbol passages	theophanic body essay
Wine-Idol Pack	scandal-symbol passages	taʾwīl essay
Dream-World Pack	time/world/dream sections	rendering ontology essay
Perfect Human Pack	human form / microcosm sections	Ibn ʿArabī bridge
Lahījī Pack	Whinfield notes from Lahījī	commentary expansion
Epilogue Pack	final rose-garden self-description	closing symbolic frame
9. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Compact metaphysical poetry	5/5	Strongest source in queue.
Symbol clusters	5/5	Face, hair, mole, wine, idol, rose, point, circle.
Divine manifestation	5/5	Strong Ibn ʿArabī lineage link.
Human form	5/5	Excellent anthropocosmic material.
Taʾwīl	5/5	Scandal-symbols require esoteric reading.
Imaginal geography	2/5	Less spatial than Avicenna/Suhrawardī.
Angelology	1/5	Not central.
Practical wayfaring	2/5	More doctrinal-poetic than manual.
Parable pedagogy	2/5	Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār stronger.
Public accessibility	5/5	Whinfield/Lederer public-domain bases.
10. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Point-Circle from Perfect Human.

Point-circle = metaphysical geometry.
Perfect human = anthropocosmic mirror.

Split

Split Human Face / Beauty from Wine / Idol.

Both are symbolic, but:

face/hair/mole = theophanic body.
wine/idol = scandalous symbolic language.
Merge

Merge time, world, and dream into one “World as Dream-Image” essay.

Delay

Delay Lahījī commentary essay until after the poem’s main symbol clusters are mapped.

Preserve

Preserve strange concrete details:

rose garden
point
circle
face
hair/curl
mole
eye
wine
idol
temple
dream-world
divine inebriation
epilogue posy gathered from the garden
11. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: perfect human, divine manifestation, unity/multiplicity.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī gives prophetic metaphysical architecture; Shabistarī gives compact symbolic poetry and visual metaphysical diagrams.

With Rūzbihān

Overlap: beauty, face, theophany.
Difference: Rūzbihān gives first-person ecstatic beauty; Shabistarī gives coded beauty-symbols.

With Rūmī

Overlap: poetry, wine, love, anti-literalism.
Difference: Rūmī teaches by story; Shabistarī teaches by compressed symbolic answer.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: metaphysical light and manifestation.
Difference: Suhrawardī gives light hierarchy; Shabistarī gives symbol geometry and body-symbolism.

12. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Divine-name chapter architecture	Ibn ʿArabī Fuṣūṣ
Bird journey / valleys	ʿAṭṭār
Barzakh / dream practice	Ibn ʿArabī Futūḥāt
Visionary autobiography	Rūzbihān
Dhikr and coloured lights	Kubrā
Apophatic divine address	al-Niffarī
Broad parable ocean	Rūmī
13. Variety review

Shabistarī completes the first queue because he adds the final missing literary mode:

Prior source	Shabistarī’s addition
Avicenna	From recital to symbolic compression
Suhrawardī	From light ontology to diagrammatic symbol
Ibn ʿArabī	From vast metaphysics to poetic condensation
ʿAṭṭār	From quest narrative to metaphysical catechism
Rūmī	From parable ocean to compact symbol-cluster
Kubrā	From visionary phenomenology to symbolic doctrine
al-Niffarī	From apophatic rupture to encoded metaphysical garden

This source is especially valuable for the art layer because its symbols are highly visual: rose, point, circle, face, hair, mole, wine, temple.

14. Balance review

Avoid two mistakes:

Mistake 1 — Treating it as pretty mystical poetry

It is a technical metaphysical poem in symbolic dress.

Mistake 2 — Treating symbols as one-to-one code

The rose, face, mole, wine, and idol are not dictionary entries. They are compressed fields of meaning that Lahījī opens through commentary.

Correct balance:

Shabistarī is not decorative. He is diagrammatic. His symbols are metaphysical machines.

15. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Rose Garden / Epilogue

Use first.

Target:

poem as rose garden
posy gathered from hidden meanings
lilies, narcissus, eyes of the heart
Pack 2 — Point and Circle

Use second.

Target:

source and manifestation
unity and multiplicity
geometry of return
Pack 3 — Human Face

Use third.

Target:

face
eye
hair/curl
mole
divine beauty as human form
Pack 4 — Wine and Idol

Use fourth.

Target:

wine
tavern
idol
temple
scandal-symbol as taʾwīl
Pack 5 — Dream-World

Use fifth.

Target:

time
world as appearance
dream-image
divine inebriation
16. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: the poem as symbolic garden
The Rose Garden as a Map of Hidden Meanings
The Point and the Circle
The Human Face as Theophany
Wine, Idol, and the Sufi Scandal of Symbols
The World as Dream-Image
The Perfect Human as the Total Mirror
Lahījī Opens the Rose
From Rūmī’s Stories to Shabistarī’s Diagrams
Full queue synthesis: ten imaginal engines
17. Final verdict

Shabistarī is the correct tenth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal can be compressed into symbol-clusters so dense that a rose, point, circle, face, hair, mole, wine-cup, idol, or temple becomes a complete metaphysical diagram. The poem is not decorative mysticism; it is a garden of coded forms requiring taʾwīl and commentary.

Use this source as the project’s compact symbolic metaphysics / human-form / point-circle / poetic compression engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 11: ʿAbd al-Karīm al-Jīlī — al-Insān al-Kāmil / The Perfect Human
1. Source identity

Primary source: ʿAbd al-Karīm al-Jīlī, al-Insān al-Kāmil fī Maʿrifat al-Awākhir wa-l-Awāʾil — The Perfect Human in the Knowledge of Things Last and First.

Why this comes after the first ten: the original queue is complete, so the next best Corbin-lineage / Akbarian source is al-Jīlī. The Ibn Arabi Society describes him as a major Ibn ʿArabī-lineage metaphysician, born in 1365, active mainly in Zabid, Yemen, and famous for developing the doctrine of the Perfect Human.

Public access: Arabic scans are available on Internet Archive. A partial English PDF titled Universal Man is publicly hosted, but it is a selected/abridged rendering and should be used cautiously.

Copyright caution: use public Arabic scans, public scholarly summaries, and short excerpts only. Avoid treating the partial English PDF as a complete reliable translation.

Text type: Akbarian metaphysical summa; perfect-human doctrine; divine-name anthropology; cosmology of manifestation.

2. Master structural reading

Al-Jīlī systematizes what Ibn ʿArabī and Shabistarī opened: the human as the total mirror of reality.

The core movement:

The Real manifests through degrees of being.
The cosmos is a vast unfolding of divine names and presences.
The Perfect Human gathers all degrees into one complete form.
The Muhammadan Reality is the supreme form of this perfection.

A recent scholarly article states that for Ibn ʿArabī’s school, the Perfect Human is both the boundary and portal between the divine absolute and created being, the culmination of divine self-disclosure, the summit of spiritual realization, and always identical in underlying reality with the timeless spirit of the Prophet Muḥammad.

3. Part / chapter map

Al-Jīlī’s work has 63 chapters. A 2024 scholarly overview notes that only chapter 60 is explicitly devoted to the Perfect Human, but al-Jīlī says that this chapter is the “mainstay” of the whole book and that the whole work explains it.

So the companion should treat the book as:

Layer	Function
Divine Essence	Absolute unknowability before manifestation
Names and Attributes	How the Real becomes knowable
Levels of Being	Degrees through which manifestation unfolds
Cosmos	The macrocosmic display of divine names
Human	The microcosmic condensation of the cosmos
Perfect Human	The complete mirror and total form
Muhammadan Reality	The supreme archetype of human completion
Return / realization	The human recognizes and embodies the total structure
4. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Perfect Human as Mirror

This is the core. The human does not merely reflect one divine name; the complete human reflects the whole order.

Use for:

mirror ontology
human as total icon
divine self-recognition
Imaginarium vessel theory
Cluster B — Boundary and Portal

The Perfect Human is not just “advanced.” He is a metaphysical threshold: divine/created, absolute/relative, invisible/visible.

Use for:

barzakh anthropology
bridge-being
human as interface
portal between worlds
Cluster C — Muhammadan Reality

This is the supreme archetypal layer. The Perfect Human is historically embodied in saints and prophets, but metaphysically rooted in the timeless Muhammadan Reality.

Use for:

archetypal prophetology
seal / totality
source-code of sanctity
cosmic human pattern
Cluster D — Levels of Being Inside the Human

Al-Jīlī is useful because he makes the human a compressed cosmos. The human contains the worlds, presences, names, and degrees.

Use for:

subtle anthropology
microcosm
vertical anatomy
inner cosmology
Cluster E — Systematizing Ibn ʿArabī

Al-Jīlī should be used as the “diagrammer” of Ibn ʿArabī’s perfect-human doctrine. The Ibn Arabi Society notes that al-Jīlī is not merely derivative; he has distinctive developments of the idea.

Use for:

Akbarian lineage
Fuṣūṣ Adam chapter continuation
post-Ibn ʿArabī metaphysics
doctrine made more architectonic
5. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Perfect Human as the Total Mirror”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Establish the human as comprehensive mirror of divine names and cosmic levels.

Essay 2 — “Boundary and Portal”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Human as barzakh between absolute and world.

Essay 3 — “The Muhammadan Reality”

Target: 4,000–5,500 words
Function: Explain the archetypal root of perfected humanity.

Essay 4 — “The Cosmos Inside the Human”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Map microcosm: levels of being, divine presences, subtle anthropology.

Essay 5 — “Al-Jīlī After Ibn ʿArabī”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Show how al-Jīlī systematizes and modifies the Akbarian lineage.

Essay 6 — “The Dangers of Perfect-Human Language”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Guard against egoic inflation, guru-fantasy, and crude “I am God” readings.

6. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location	Use
Chapter 60 Pack	Perfect Human chapter	Core mirror essay
Divine Names Pack	early metaphysical chapters	Names and attributes
Levels Pack	chapters on presences/degrees	inner cosmology
Muhammadan Pack	prophetic / Muhammadan Reality material	archetypal totality
Akbarian Bridge Pack	Ibn ʿArabī Adam chapter + al-Jīlī	lineage essay
Warning Pack	transcendence/immanence balance	anti-inflation essay
7. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Perfect Human	5/5	Strongest post-Ibn ʿArabī source.
Human as mirror	5/5	Core doctrine.
Muhammadan Reality	5/5	Essential archetypal layer.
Divine names	4/5	Strong, though Fuṣūṣ is cleaner.
Microcosm	5/5	Excellent for Imaginarium.
Imaginal geography	3/5	More anthropological than spatial.
Practice method	2/5	Less practical than Kubrā.
Poetic pedagogy	1/5	Not Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār mode.
Public accessibility	3/5	Arabic available; English partial/cautious.
8. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Perfect Human from Muhammadan Reality.

They are linked, but:

Perfect Human = realized anthropocosmic form.
Muhammadan Reality = archetypal root and supreme pattern.
Split

Split human as mirror from human as portal.

Mirror = reflective totality.
Portal = mediating threshold.

Merge

Merge levels, presences, names, and cosmos into Cosmos Inside the Human.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

63-chapter architecture
chapter 60 as “mainstay”
boundary / portal
mirror of names
human as final cause of creation
Muhammadan Reality
complete human as cosmic condensation
9. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Bird-path psychology	ʿAṭṭār
Dreams and body of light	Futūḥāt
Ecstatic visionary autobiography	Rūzbihān
Dhikr-colour phenomenology	Kubrā
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Parable pedagogy	Rūmī
10. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: 63 chapters as explanation of chapter 60
The Perfect Human as the Total Mirror
Boundary and Portal
The Muhammadan Reality
The Cosmos Inside the Human
Al-Jīlī After Ibn ʿArabī
The Dangers of Perfect-Human Language
Bridge note: Shabistarī’s human form → al-Jīlī’s total human
11. Final verdict

Al-Jīlī is the right eleventh source because he gathers the whole first queue into a single anthropocosmic doctrine.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The human is not merely a seeker in the cosmos but the place where the cosmos is gathered, mirrored, and completed. The Perfect Human stands as boundary and portal between the Absolute and creation, the complete mirror of divine names, and the living condensation of all levels of being.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 12: Ṣadr al-Dīn al-Qūnawī — Miftāḥ al-Ghayb / The Key to the Unseen
1. Source identity

Primary source: Ṣadr al-Dīn al-Qūnawī, Miftāḥ al-Ghayb, often rendered The Key to the Unseen.

Why this is next: the first ten-source queue is complete, and al-Jīlī has already been added as source 11. Qūnawī is the strongest next source because he is Ibn ʿArabī’s foremost direct disciple and one of the major systematizers of Akbarian metaphysics. A manuscript record identifies Miftāḥ al-Ghayb and lists Chittick’s study of Qūnawī as “Ibn Arabi’s Foremost Disciple.”

Public access: manuscript and bibliographic records are available through Islam-Anatolia. Scholarly articles and summaries are publicly accessible, including a study describing Miftāḥ al-Ghayb as a guidebook of theoretical taṣawwuf.

Copyright caution: English access is limited and scattered. Use public summaries, manuscript records, scholarly articles, and short excerpts only. Treat this mainly as a structural / metaphysical blueprint source, not a quote-heavy source.

Text type: Akbarian metaphysical prose; theoretical Sufism; ontology of the Unseen; systematization of Ibn ʿArabī.

2. Why Qūnawī matters for Imaginarium

Qūnawī is the bridge between Ibn ʿArabī’s visionary vastness and later systematic Sufi metaphysics.

Earlier sources gave:

Source	Gift
Ibn ʿArabī Fuṣūṣ	divine names and prophetic wisdoms
Ibn ʿArabī Futūḥāt	barzakh, dreams, practice, cosmology
Shabistarī	poetic symbolic compression
al-Jīlī	Perfect Human doctrine

Qūnawī adds:

a rigorous metaphysical key: how the Unseen becomes intelligible without becoming merely conceptual.

This is crucial for Imaginarium because it helps stop the project becoming only poetic/visionary. It gives the technical metaphysical spine behind imaginal ontology.

3. Master structural reading

Read Miftāḥ al-Ghayb as a key-text for the passage from the Unseen to manifestation.

Core movement:

The Real in itself exceeds all grasp.
The Unseen is not empty absence; it is the hidden root of manifestation.
Knowledge must be properly ordered, not merely accumulated.
Divine self-disclosure descends through levels, relations, names, and loci.
The human being becomes the site where the Unseen can be known in form.
The metaphysical path requires method, not mystical impressionism.
4. Part / function map

Because public table-of-contents access is incomplete, structure the companion by doctrinal modules:

Module	Function
The Unseen	Hidden source; what cannot be grasped directly.
Key / opening	Method of access; how metaphysics becomes usable.
Knowledge	Distinguishes realization from conceptual possession.
Divine Names	The grammar of manifestation.
Relations	How the Real appears without being divided.
Levels of Being	Descent from hiddenness into worlds/forms.
Human locus	Human as site of synthesis and disclosure.
Commentary tradition	Fanārī and later Ottoman/Iranian metaphysics.
The Ibn Arabi Society notes that Mullā Fanārī’s commentary on Qūnawī’s Miftāḥ al-Ghayb remained studied and helped introduce Ibn ʿArabī’s ideas into Ottoman intellectual life.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Unseen as Hidden Root

Not “invisible stuff,” but the source-dimension from which manifestation becomes possible.

Use for:

hidden ontology
imaginal source-world
pre-formal reality
unseen-to-form transition
Cluster B — The Key

The “key” is methodological: correct ordering of metaphysical knowledge.

Use for:

Imaginarium method
avoiding vague mysticism
disciplined concept architecture
source-to-essay extraction logic
Cluster C — Divine Names as Manifestation Grammar

Qūnawī continues the Akbarian grammar: forms disclose names, names disclose relations, relations disclose the Real without containing it.

Use for:

symbolic tagging
art/concept ontology
divine-name mapping
form as disclosure
Cluster D — Relations Without Division

This is a technical but important cluster: manifestation does not split the Real into pieces. Relations allow multiplicity without crude separation.

Use for:

unity/multiplicity
nondual precision
anti-pantheism guardrail
metaphysical rigor
Cluster E — The Human as Knowing Locus

The human is not merely observer; the human is where the Real’s self-disclosure becomes conscious.

Use for:

Perfect Human bridge
microcosm
consciousness as locus
self-disclosure through knowing
Cluster F — From Visionary Ibn ʿArabī to School Metaphysics

Qūnawī helps convert Ibn ʿArabī into a transmissible intellectual lineage.

Use for:

Akbarian school
commentary tradition
Ottoman/Iranian transmission
rigorous metaphysical prose
6. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Key to the Unseen”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Introduce Qūnawī as the method-builder of Akbarian metaphysics.

Essay 2 — “The Unseen Is Not Empty”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Explain hiddenness as source, not absence.

Essay 3 — “Divine Names as the Grammar of Manifestation”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Bridge Fuṣūṣ divine-name metaphysics into systematic method.

Essay 4 — “Relations Without Division”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Technical essay on how unity appears as multiplicity without becoming fragmented.

Essay 5 — “The Human Locus of Disclosure”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Link Qūnawī to al-Jīlī’s Perfect Human.

Essay 6 — “From Ibn ʿArabī’s Ocean to Qūnawī’s Method”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Show how Qūnawī systematizes the Akbarian inheritance.

Essay 7 — “Fanārī Opens the Key”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Commentary-tradition essay: why later Ottoman metaphysics kept studying Miftāḥ al-Ghayb.

7. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / base	Use
Manuscript Pack	Islam-Anatolia Miftāḥ al-Ghayb record	source identity
Qūnawī Biography Pack	Chittick / EI references listed in manuscript record	author frame
Theoretical Taṣawwuf Pack	public article on Miftāḥ al-Ghayb	method essay
Divine Names Pack	compare with Ibn ʿArabī Fuṣūṣ	manifestation grammar
Human Locus Pack	compare with al-Jīlī chapter 60	Perfect Human bridge
Fanārī Pack	Ibn Arabi Society article	commentary tradition
Anti-Slop Pack	Qūnawī as systematizer	rigor / method
8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Akbarian metaphysical rigor	5/5	Main value.
Divine names	4/5	Strong, but Fuṣūṣ remains primary.
Unseen / manifestation	5/5	Core source.
Human as locus	4/5	Strong bridge to al-Jīlī.
Commentary tradition	5/5	Excellent for lineage.
Imaginal geography	2/5	More abstract than Corbin/Suhrawardī.
Visionary narrative	1/5	Not the mode.
Practical method	2/5	Intellectual method, not dhikr manual.
Public accessibility	3/5	Manuscript records and articles available; translations limited.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Unseen from Divine Names.

The Unseen is source-hiddenness. Divine Names are manifestation grammar.

Split

Split Human Locus from Perfect Human

Use al-Jīlī for the full Perfect Human doctrine. Use Qūnawī for the metaphysical condition that makes the human a knowing locus.

Merge

Merge later commentary tradition into one essay around Fanārī.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

“Key” as method
Unseen as hidden source
Qūnawī as Ibn ʿArabī’s foremost disciple
Miftāḥ as advanced metaphysical text
Fanārī commentary
Ottoman/Iranian scholastic transmission
theoretical taṣawwuf as a formal science
10. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: divine names, self-disclosure, unity of being.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī gives vast revelation and symbolic density; Qūnawī gives method and system.

With al-Jīlī

Overlap: human as locus, Perfect Human.
Difference: al-Jīlī foregrounds the Perfect Human; Qūnawī foregrounds metaphysical principles.

With Shabistarī

Overlap: symbolic metaphysics and Ibn ʿArabī lineage.
Difference: Shabistarī compresses into poetry; Qūnawī formalizes into prose.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: hidden/manifest, metaphysical hierarchy.
Difference: Suhrawardī is light ontology; Qūnawī is Akbarian unseen/manifestation method.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Bird-soul initiation	ʿAṭṭār
Barzakh and dreams	Ibn ʿArabī Futūḥāt
Ecstatic beauty	Rūzbihān
Dhikr and coloured lights	Kubrā
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Parable pedagogy	Rūmī
12. Variety review

Qūnawī adds a new mode:

Prior mode	Qūnawī’s addition
Visionary recital	metaphysical method
Light ontology	Akbarian unseen/manifestation grammar
Poetic parable	theoretical taṣawwuf
Visionary autobiography	systematic prose
Perfect Human doctrine	conditions of disclosure and knowledge

This makes him especially valuable as a rigor source.

13. Final recommended sequence
Source architecture map: Qūnawī as the key-holder of Akbarian metaphysics
The Key to the Unseen
The Unseen Is Not Empty
Divine Names as the Grammar of Manifestation
Relations Without Division
The Human Locus of Disclosure
From Ibn ʿArabī’s Ocean to Qūnawī’s Method
Fanārī Opens the Key
Bridge note: Qūnawī → Mullā Ṣadrā, from Akbarian metaphysics to later Islamic philosophy
14. Final verdict

Qūnawī is the correct twelfth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal and metaphysical worlds need a key, not just images. Qūnawī turns Ibn ʿArabī’s vast symbolic ocean into disciplined theoretical taṣawwuf: the Unseen as hidden source, divine names as manifestation grammar, relations without division, and the human as the locus where disclosure becomes knowable.

Use this source as the project’s Akbarian method / Unseen-to-manifestation / metaphysical rigor engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 13: Mullā Ṣadrā — al-Ḥikma al-Mutaʿāliyya fī al-Asfār al-ʿAqliyya al-Arbaʿa / The Four Intellectual Journeys
1. Source identity

Primary source: Ṣadr al-Dīn Muḥammad Shīrāzī, known as Mullā Ṣadrā, al-Asfār al-Arbaʿa / The Four Journeys.

Why this comes next: the first ten-source queue is complete; al-Jīlī and Qūnawī have already extended the Akbarian line. Mullā Ṣadrā is the next major synthesis point because his system explicitly draws together Avicennan philosophy, Suhrawardī’s Illuminationism, and Ibn ʿArabī’s Sufi metaphysics. SEP describes The Four Journeys as a major source for Islamic philosophy, showing Avicennan structure, Suhrawardī’s critique of Avicennism, and Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysical monism.

Public access: full Arabic/Persian scans and partial studies are available online, but there is no complete standard English translation. A public study of Ṣadrā’s transcendent philosophy gives useful chapter-level summaries of being, trans-substantial motion, knowledge, and soul.

Copyright caution: use public summaries, Arabic scans, scholarly articles, and short excerpts only. This should be a structural / philosophical extraction source, not a quote-heavy source.

Text type: later Islamic philosophical summa; transcendent theosophy; ontology of being; soul-body-resurrection metaphysics; imaginal-world philosophy.

2. Why Mullā Ṣadrā matters for Imaginarium

Ṣadrā gives the project a philosophical engine for transformation itself.

Earlier sources gave:

Source	Core gift
Avicenna / Corbin	angel-guide, Orient/Occident
Suhrawardī	light ontology, presential knowledge
Ibn ʿArabī	divine names, manifestation, barzakh
Kubrā	visionary lights and practice
al-Niffarī	anti-visionary apophasis
al-Jīlī / Qūnawī	perfect human and Akbarian metaphysical rigor

Ṣadrā adds:

Being itself is graded, intensified, and in motion. The soul is not a static substance trapped in a body; it is generated bodily, becomes spiritual, and forms its own imaginal-resurrection body.

This is massive for Imaginarium: it gives metaphysical support for rendering as ontological intensification.

3. Master structural reading

Read The Four Journeys through four engines:

Engine A — Primacy and gradation of being

Ṣadrā’s system shifts from essence to existence. SEP says he is often described as a metaphysical revolutionary because of his doctrine of existence.

Use this to ground:

reality as intensity
forms as degrees of being
spiritual development as ontological intensification
Engine B — Trans-substantial motion

Change is not merely accidental. Substance itself moves. A public study identifies trans-substantial change as one of Ṣadrā’s central doctrines and links it to the constant renewal of the world.

Use for:

the self as process
practice as real ontological change
the world as dynamic manifestation
Engine C — Knowledge by presence

Ṣadrā inherits and deepens Suhrawardī’s presential knowledge. Public summaries note that his thought explores knowledge by presence and the limits of rationalistic apprehension.

Use for:

knowing as being
cognition beyond representation
contemplative intellect
Engine D — Imagination, barzakh, and resurrection body

Ṣadrā argues that imagination is incorruptible and uses it to explain reward, punishment, resurrection, soul purification, mystical visions, and revelation.

A study on imagination in Ṣadrā’s eschatology says he employs Ibn ʿArabī’s theory of imagination while reworking soul/body, death, barzakh, and afterlife through his doctrine of substantive movement.

Use for:

imaginal body
afterlife form
dream/resurrection ontology
deeds becoming objective image
4. Four-journey map

Use this as the source architecture:

Journey	Function for Imaginarium
Journey 1: from creation to the Real	Ontology: being, essence, gradation, motion, departure from surface-world.
Journey 2: in the Real by the Real	Divine attributes, higher metaphysics, knowing through presence.
Journey 3: from the Real to creation by the Real	Cosmology: return of manifestation, divine knowledge, worlds, order.
Journey 4: in creation by the Real	Soul, embodiment, death, resurrection, imaginal body, return to world with transformed vision.
The final journey is the highest-yield Imaginarium section because it treats soul, destiny, death, and resurrection. Public summaries describe the fourth journey as dealing with the soul, human destiny, death, and resurrection.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Being as Intensity

Reality is not flat. Beings differ by intensity, clarity, and existential degree.

Use for:

rendering intensity
hierarchy without crude dualism
spiritual ascent as intensification
light ontology translated into being ontology
Cluster B — Substantial Motion

The soul is not a fixed entity. The world and soul are in deep motion.

Use for:

transformation theory
spiritual practice as ontological change
selfing loop with metaphysical depth
becoming rather than static identity
Cluster C — The Soul: Bodily in Origin, Spiritual in Subsistence

A public summary describes Ṣadrā’s theory as “corporeality of contingency and spirituality of subsistence” regarding the soul.

Use for:

body-soul continuity
anti-Cartesian anthropology
subtle body
embodiment as developmental root
Cluster D — Imagination as Incorruptible

This is the central imaginal cluster. The imaginal faculty survives bodily death and shapes resurrection experience.

Use for:

dream body
barzakh
afterlife imagination
visionary reality
internal images becoming worlds
Cluster E — Resurrection Body

IEP summarizes Ṣadrā’s position: the soul creates its own otherworldly body as an objective image of its intentions and deeds, not by reincarnation.

Use for:

karma-like form without importing Buddhist categories too loosely
deeds becoming body
moral imagination
afterlife as rendered embodiment
Cluster F — Synthesis of Avicenna, Suhrawardī, and Ibn ʿArabī

Ṣadrā is a synthesis source: he absorbs Avicennan philosophy, Suhrawardī’s illumination, and Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysics.

Use for:

full lineage integration
Corbin-lineage bridge
philosophical rigor
avoiding purely poetic mysticism
6. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “Being Is Not Flat”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Explain primacy and gradation of being as the philosophical ground for imaginal hierarchy.

Essay 2 — “Substantial Motion: The Soul Is Becoming Real”

Target: 4,000–5,500 words
Function: Core transformation essay: practice changes not just mental content but ontological mode.

Essay 3 — “Bodily in Origin, Spiritual in Survival”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Explain Ṣadrā’s soul theory and why embodiment matters.

Essay 4 — “Imagination Does Not Die”

Target: 4,500–5,500 words
Function: Major Imaginarium essay: imagination as surviving faculty and world-making power.

Essay 5 — “The Resurrection Body as Objective Image”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Moral-ontological body: deeds, intentions, and inward form become posthumous reality.

Essay 6 — “From Suhrawardī’s Light to Ṣadrā’s Being”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Show the shift from hierarchy of lights to hierarchy/intensity of being.

Essay 7 — “Ibn ʿArabī’s Barzakh in Philosophical Form”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Connect Futūḥāt imagination/barzakh to Ṣadrā’s eschatology.

Essay 8 — “The Four Journeys as a Map of Re-Rendering”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Use the whole work’s architecture as a spiritual-intellectual transformation map.

7. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / base	Use
Being Pack	Journey 1; SEP; public studies	primacy/gradation essay
Motion Pack	Journey 1; trans-substantial motion summaries	transformation essay
Knowledge Pack	Ṣadrā on knowledge by presence	presential cognition bridge
Soul Pack	Journey 4; soul origin/subsistence materials	embodiment essay
Imagination Pack	al-Islam article + eschatology article	imagination/resurrection essay
Resurrection Pack	Journey 4; IEP resurrection summary	objective image body
Synthesis Pack	SEP on Avicenna/Suhrawardī/Ibn ʿArabī influences	lineage essay
Four Journeys Pack	overall Asfār architecture	final map essay
8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Ontology of being	5/5	Core Ṣadrā contribution.
Transformation / motion	5/5	Strongest source for ontological becoming.
Soul-body relation	5/5	Essential for subtle embodiment.
Imagination	5/5	Crucial for imaginal survival and resurrection.
Barzakh / afterlife	5/5	Strong philosophical eschatology.
Divine-name metaphysics	3/5	Ibn ʿArabī cleaner.
Angelology	2/5	Not main focus.
Practical wayfaring	3/5	Journey-structure, but not Kubrā-like manual.
Poetic pedagogy	1/5	Not Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār mode.
Public accessibility	3/5	Good summaries; complete English access limited.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Being as Intensity from Substantial Motion.

Being = vertical degree.
Motion = dynamic transformation.

Split

Split Imagination Does Not Die from Resurrection Body.

Imagination = faculty/world-making power.
Resurrection body = result/form of soul’s moral-ontological history.

Merge

Merge barzakh, afterlife, and mystical vision into the imagination/resurrection cluster.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

four journeys
primacy of being
gradation/intensity of being
trans-substantial motion
knowledge by presence
soul bodily in origin, spiritual in subsistence
imagination as incorruptible
resurrection body as objective image of deeds
mirror analogy for otherworldly body
synthesis of Avicenna, Suhrawardī, Ibn ʿArabī
10. Overlap warnings
With Suhrawardī

Overlap: presence, light, hierarchy.
Difference: Suhrawardī frames hierarchy through light; Ṣadrā reframes it through being and intensity.

With Ibn ʿArabī’s Futūḥāt

Overlap: barzakh, imagination, afterlife.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī gives visionary-cosmological barzakh; Ṣadrā gives philosophical proof-architecture.

With Qūnawī

Overlap: Akbarian rigor, unseen-to-manifestation.
Difference: Qūnawī systematizes Ibn ʿArabī; Ṣadrā synthesizes Akbarian, Avicennan, and Illuminationist philosophy into a new ontology of being.

With Kubrā

Overlap: transformation, inner perception.
Difference: Kubrā gives practice phenomenology; Ṣadrā gives metaphysical explanation of transformation.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide narrative	Avicenna / Corbin
Bird-soul typology	ʿAṭṭār
First-person ecstatic vision	Rūzbihān
Dhikr / coloured lights	Kubrā
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Parable pedagogy	Rūmī
Symbolic poetry	Shabistarī
Perfect Human doctrine	al-Jīlī
12. Variety review

Ṣadrā adds a new engine:

Prior mode	Ṣadrā’s addition
Visionary recital	philosophical transformation ontology
Light ontology	being-intensity ontology
Akbarian barzakh	eschatological proof of imaginal body
Kubrawī practice	metaphysics of how the soul actually changes
Rūmī parable	systematic account of becoming
Qūnawī method	broader synthesis with Avicenna and Suhrawardī

This makes him crucial for grounding Imaginarium’s metaphysics of re-rendering as real ontological becoming.

13. Final recommended sequence
Source architecture map: The Four Journeys as transformation structure
Being Is Not Flat
Substantial Motion: The Soul Is Becoming Real
Bodily in Origin, Spiritual in Survival
Imagination Does Not Die
The Resurrection Body as Objective Image
From Suhrawardī’s Light to Ṣadrā’s Being
Ibn ʿArabī’s Barzakh in Philosophical Form
The Four Journeys as a Map of Re-Rendering
14. Final verdict

Mullā Ṣadrā is the correct thirteenth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The soul is not merely interpreting symbols; it is undergoing ontological transformation. Being is graded in intensity, substance itself moves, knowledge becomes presence, imagination survives bodily death, and the resurrection body is the objective image of what the soul has become.

Use this source as the project’s being-intensity / substantial-motion / imaginal-resurrection-body engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 14: Sayyid Ḥaydar Āmulī — Jāmiʿ al-Asrār wa Manbaʿ al-Anwār / Inner Secrets of the Path
1. Source identity

Primary figure: Sayyid Ḥaydar Āmulī, 1319–c.1385, Shiʿi gnostic, philosopher, and major interpreter of Ibn ʿArabī.

Primary source cluster:

Jāmiʿ al-Asrār wa Manbaʿ al-Anwār — The Compendium of Mysteries and Source of Lights
Asrār al-Sharīʿa wa Aṭwār al-Ṭarīqa wa Anwār al-Ḥaqīqa — translated as Inner Secrets of the Path
Naṣṣ al-Nuṣūṣ fī Sharḥ Fuṣūṣ al-Ḥikam — Āmulī’s commentary on Ibn ʿArabī’s Fuṣūṣ

Best public-access base: Inner Secrets of the Path is freely available on Al-Islam.org and as a PDF through Sufism.ir. It is described as a work on how spiritual travellers should walk the path using the Sharia, and it deals with the roots and branches of religion.

Corbin link: Henry Corbin and Osman Yahia edited Āmulī’s La Philosophie Shîʿite, a major edition connected to Āmulī’s Shiʿi metaphysics. A Cambridge review identifies the 1969 Corbin/Yahia edition as Sayyed Haydar Amoli, La Philosophie Shîʿite.

Copyright caution: Inner Secrets is publicly readable, but modern translation status should still be treated cautiously. Use summation and short excerpts. For Jāmiʿ al-Asrār, access is more scattered, so use public articles, bibliographic records, and source-traceable paraphrase.

2. Why this source comes fourteenth

After Mullā Ṣadrā, the next strongest source is Āmulī because he fuses:

Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysics + Shiʿi walāya + esoteric interpretation + law/path/truth architecture.

This is the missing Corbinian Shiʿi bridge. Āmulī is not just another Akbarian metaphysician. He asks:

What if the deepest Sufi metaphysics and the inner meaning of Shiʿism are the same reality viewed under different names?

Public summaries describe his project as a synthesis of Shiʿism and Sufism, especially through the framework of sharīʿa, ṭarīqa, ḥaqīqa and the role of the Imams as bearers of mystical knowledge.

3. Master structural reading

Read Āmulī as a reconciliation engine.

His core structure:

Sharīʿa — outer law, form, body of religion.
Ṭarīqa — path, discipline, inward movement.
Ḥaqīqa — truth, unveiling, inner reality.
Walāya — sanctity / spiritual authority / esoteric guardianship.
Imamate — historical and metaphysical locus of walāya.
Tawḥīd — unity read through both Akbarian and Shiʿi lenses.
Taʾwīl — symbols, law, scripture, and doctrine opened inwardly.

Al-Islam’s description of Inner Secrets says it discusses how spiritual travellers walk the path through the Sharia and deals with roots and branches of religion. Google Books also describes it as integrating inner and outer aspects of Islam through levels of meaning.

4. Part / function map
A. Inner Secrets of the Path
Section / theme	Function
Roots of religion	Converts theology into inner wayfaring.
Branches of religion	Shows practice as symbolic and transformative.
Sharīʿa	Outer form as necessary container.
Ṭarīqa	Interiorization of law into path.
Ḥaqīqa	Truth as unveiled inner meaning.
Unity / tawḥīd	Metaphysical foundation.
Prophecy / next life	Esoteric interpretation of doctrine.
Symbolic Qurʾān interpretation	Core taʾwīl engine.
B. Jāmiʿ al-Asrār
Theme	Function
Shiʿi-Sufi identity	Main reconciliation project.
Walāya	Central doctrine of sanctity and authority.
Relation to Ibn ʿArabī	Acceptance, correction, Shiʿi re-reading.
Seal of walāya	Major point of disagreement with Ibn ʿArabī.
Pure tawḥīd	Esoteric monotheism beyond outer theology.
C. Commentary on Fuṣūṣ
Theme	Function
Akbarian chapter architecture	Links directly to source 3.
Shiʿi correction of Ibn ʿArabī	Keeps lineage dynamic, not passive.
Prophetic wisdoms and Imamate	Re-reads prophetic metaphysics through walāya.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Sharīʿa, Ṭarīqa, Ḥaqīqa

This is the basic three-layer model.

Use for:

outer form / inner path / truth
avoiding lawless mysticism
symbolic practice
layered interpretation
form as container of meaning
Cluster B — Walāya

This is Āmulī’s core Imaginarium contribution.

Walāya means sainthood, friendship, authority, nearness, guardianship, and esoteric transmission. It is the living current beneath outer religion.

Use for:

lineage
spiritual authority
daimonic guardianship
inner guide tradition
Imam as esoteric pole
Cluster C — Shiʿism and Sufism as One Esoteric Current

Āmulī argues against both:

Shiʿites who reduce religion to outer rule
Sufis who detach spirituality from the Imams

Use for:

reconciliation
anti-fragmentation
hidden unity of traditions
esotericism as inner identity
Cluster D — The Imams as Bearers of Inner Knowledge

This is the Corbinian jewel.

The Imam is not merely a political or historical figure. In this reading, the Imam becomes the living pole of taʾwīl, walāya, and hidden meaning.

Use for:

imaginal guide
spiritual pole
hidden Imam
esoteric authority
Corbinian Shiʿi angelology bridge
Cluster E — Tawḥīd as Esoteric Realization

Āmulī’s unity is not basic monotheistic assertion. It is a realized metaphysical seeing.

Use for:

unity of being
pure monotheism
anti-idolatry of concepts
metaphysical discipline
Cluster F — Correcting Ibn ʿArabī

This is important: Āmulī is not a passive transmitter. Public scholarship notes his relationship to Ibn ʿArabī and especially disputes over walāya and the Seal of Saints.

Use for:

lineage debate
productive disagreement
Shiʿi Akbarianism
correction as fidelity
6. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Threefold Path: Law, Way, Truth”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Inner Secrets of the Path.
Function: Establish sharīʿa/ṭarīqa/ḥaqīqa as layered reality, not legalism vs mysticism.

Essay 2 — “Walāya: The Hidden Current of Sanctity”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Jāmiʿ al-Asrār scholarship + Inner Secrets.
Function: Core Āmulī essay: sanctity, authority, guardianship, esoteric nearness.

Essay 3 — “The Imam as Pole of Taʾwīl”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: Āmulī’s Shiʿi-Sufi synthesis; Corbinian frame.
Function: The Imam as living interpreter and hidden center of meaning.

Essay 4 — “Sufism and Shiʿism Are Not Two”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Source base: public articles on Āmulī’s synthesis.
Function: Show how Āmulī identifies the inner truth of both currents.

Essay 5 — “Pure Tawḥīd and the Inner Meaning of Monotheism”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Source base: Inner Secrets, unity sections.
Function: Move from doctrinal monotheism to realized unity.

Essay 6 — “Āmulī Reads Ibn ʿArabī Against Ibn ʿArabī”

Target: 4,000–5,500 words
Source base: Seal of Absolute Walāya debate; Fuṣūṣ commentary frame.
Function: Productive disagreement: Akbarian metaphysics Shiʿized.

Essay 7 — “The Path Needs a Form”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Source base: roots/branches of religion.
Function: Guardrail essay: outer practices as symbolic bodies of inner reality.

Essay 8 — “From Ṣadrā’s Ontology to Āmulī’s Walāya”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Bridge: being-intensity becomes esoteric authority and inner guidance.

7. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source location / base	Use
Threefold Path Pack	Inner Secrets: sharīʿa / ṭarīqa / ḥaqīqa	Essay 1
Roots Pack	roots of religion	theology as inner path
Branches Pack	branches of religion	practice as symbolic form
Walāya Pack	Jāmiʿ al-Asrār summaries; Rustom article	Essay 2
Imam Pack	Shiʿi-Sufi synthesis materials	Essay 3
Ibn ʿArabī Pack	Fuṣūṣ commentary / Seal of walāya debate	Essay 6
Corbin Pack	Corbin/Yahia La Philosophie Shîʿite reference	Corbin-lineage framing
Anti-Slop Pack	critique of outer-only Shiʿism and Imam-less Sufism	balance essay
8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Shiʿi esotericism	5/5	Strongest source so far.
Walāya	5/5	Core Āmulī contribution.
Sharīʿa/ṭarīqa/ḥaqīqa	5/5	Excellent layered model.
Taʾwīl	5/5	Strong through Imam and Qurʾanic symbolism.
Akbarian critique	5/5	Important after Ibn ʿArabī/Qūnawī/Jīlī.
Imaginal guide/pole	4/5	Strong Corbinian value.
Light ontology	2/5	Suhrawardī stronger.
Visionary phenomenology	2/5	Kubrā/Rūzbihān stronger.
Parable pedagogy	1/5	Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār stronger.
Public accessibility	4/5	Inner Secrets is readable; Jāmiʿ less accessible.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split Walāya from Imamate.

They are linked, but:

walāya = metaphysical sanctity / esoteric authority.
Imamate = Shiʿi historical-symbolic locus of that authority.
Split

Split Threefold Path from Practice Form.

Threefold path = structural model.
Practice form = roots/branches as symbolic body.

Merge

Merge Shiʿi-Sufi synthesis and critique of partial religion into one essay.

Delay

Delay the technical dispute with Ibn ʿArabī until after walāya is established.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

sharīʿa / ṭarīqa / ḥaqīqa
roots and branches of religion
walāya
Seal of Absolute walāya
Imams as mystical guides
critique of outer-only Shiʿism
critique of Imam-less Sufism
Āmulī leaving courtly life
Corbin/Yahia edition
“source of lights” in Jāmiʿ al-Asrār wa Manbaʿ al-Anwār
10. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: unity, divine names, Perfect Human, walāya.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī frames walāya in universal Sufi-prophetic terms; Āmulī re-centres it through Shiʿi Imamate.

With Corbin

Overlap: Shiʿi esotericism, hidden Imam, taʾwīl.
Difference: Corbin interprets; Āmulī is a primary insider source.

With Qūnawī / Jīlī

Overlap: Akbarian metaphysics.
Difference: Qūnawī systematizes method; Jīlī systematizes Perfect Human; Āmulī Shiʿizes Akbarian walāya.

With Kubrā

Overlap: path and spiritual discipline.
Difference: Kubrā gives visionary practice; Āmulī gives law-path-truth and authority structure.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angelic visionary recital	Avicenna / Corbin
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Bird-soul parable	ʿAṭṭār
Barzakh/dream cosmology	Ibn ʿArabī Futūḥāt
Ecstatic beauty diary	Rūzbihān
Colour-light practice	Kubrā
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Broad poetic pedagogy	Rūmī
Point-circle symbolic poetry	Shabistarī
Substantial motion	Mullā Ṣadrā
12. Variety review

Āmulī adds a new engine:

Prior mode	Āmulī’s addition
Akbarian metaphysics	Shiʿi walāya and Imamate
Corbinian commentary	primary Shiʿi esoteric source
Sufi path manuals	law/path/truth integration
Perfect Human doctrine	Imam as esoteric pole
Theoretical taṣawwuf	mystical theology of authority

This is crucial for keeping the Corbin-lineage side of the project alive after many Sufi/Akbarian sources.

13. Balance review

Avoid two mistakes:

Mistake 1 — Turning Āmulī into sectarian apologetics

The value is not “Shiʿism wins.” The value is how he uses Shiʿi categories to deepen esoteric metaphysics.

Mistake 2 — Treating Sufism and Shiʿism as vaguely “same”

Āmulī’s synthesis is specific: walāya, Imamate, inner meaning, law/path/truth, and critique of partial understandings.

Correct balance:

Āmulī is a reconciliation theorist, not a blur-machine. He preserves distinctions in order to reveal inner identity.

14. Recommended next passage packs
Pack 1 — Threefold Path

Use first.

Target:

sharīʿa
ṭarīqa
ḥaqīqa
outer/inner/truth
roots and branches
Pack 2 — Walāya

Use second.

Target:

sanctity
guardianship
Seal of walāya
nearness
esoteric authority
Pack 3 — Imam / Taʾwīl

Use third.

Target:

Imam as inner guide
hidden meaning
Qurʾanic symbolic interpretation
Corbinian Shiʿi frame
Pack 4 — Ibn ʿArabī Dispute

Use fourth.

Target:

Āmulī’s acceptance of Ibn ʿArabī
disagreement over walāya
Shiʿi response to Akbarian categories
Pack 5 — Practice Form

Use fifth.

Target:

roots of religion
branches of religion
outer observance as body of inner truth
15. Final recommended companion sequence
Source architecture map: Shiʿi-Sufi esotericism and the threefold path
The Threefold Path: Law, Way, Truth
Walāya: The Hidden Current of Sanctity
The Imam as Pole of Taʾwīl
Sufism and Shiʿism Are Not Two
Pure Tawḥīd and the Inner Meaning of Monotheism
Āmulī Reads Ibn ʿArabī Against Ibn ʿArabī
The Path Needs a Form
Bridge note: Āmulī → Corbin’s Shiʿi imaginal world
16. Final verdict

Sayyid Ḥaydar Āmulī is the correct fourteenth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal path needs a doctrine of esoteric authority. Āmulī fuses Sufism and Shiʿism through sharīʿa, ṭarīqa, ḥaqīqa, walāya, Imamate, taʾwīl, and pure tawḥīd. He makes the Imam the pole of inner meaning and turns Akbarian metaphysics into Shiʿi mystical theology.

Use this source as the project’s walāya / Imam / law-path-truth / Shiʿi esoteric authority engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 15: ʿAlāʾ al-Dawla Simnānī — Kubrawī Subtle Centres, Colour-Vision, and Critique of Ibn ʿArabī
1. Source identity

Primary figure: ʿAlāʾ al-Dawla Simnānī, 1261–1336, Persian Kubrawī Sufi master, poet, mystic, and critic of Ibn ʿArabī’s growing influence in Iran. Encyclopaedia Iranica identifies him as a major Ilkhanid-period mystic and notes his opposition to Ibn ʿArabī’s influence.

Primary source cluster:

Simnānī’s Kubrawī subtle-centre writings — especially his system of inner centres, colours, and prophetic correspondences.
Anti-Akbarian polemical material — especially his critique of Ibn ʿArabī’s language around absolute being and identity.
Kubrawī colour-vision lineage — extending Najm al-Dīn Kubrā’s visionary light phenomenology into a more articulated subtle-body map.

Public access: clean full English editions are limited. Use Encyclopaedia Iranica, Hurqalya, public scholarly articles, article abstracts, and cautious summaries. Hurqalya identifies Simnānī as a Kubrawī mystic who modified Ibn ʿArabī’s concept of waḥdat al-wujūd and became influential for later Naqshbandīs.

Copyright caution: use extensive summation. Avoid long quotation. Treat online PDFs and scans case-by-case.

2. Why this source comes fifteenth

After Āmulī, who Shiʿized and reconciled Akbarian metaphysics, Simnānī is the necessary counter-current.

He adds:

a disciplined subtle-body colour map and a critique of excessive identity-language in Ibn ʿArabī.

This gives Imaginarium a vital balancing source:

not just “all is manifestation”
not just “visionary lights appear”
but which inner organ is seeing, what colour marks the state, and where metaphysical language risks collapsing God and world too quickly
3. Master structural reading

Read Simnānī as a corrective Kubrawī cartographer.

His engine:

The human being contains subtle centres.
Each centre has a colour, state, prophetic resonance, and stage of purification.
Visionary colours are diagnostic, not decorative.
Spiritual ascent is not abstract unity-talk; it passes through embodied inner organs.
Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysics must be handled carefully so unity does not become careless identity.

A PhilPapers abstract says Simnānī’s critique of Ibn ʿArabī centres on two issues: using wujūd al-muṭlaq for God, and a phrase from the Futūḥāt about God manifesting things while being their very entity.

4. Part / function map
Source area	Function
Courtly youth / renunciation	From Ilkhanid political world into Sufi discipline.
Kubrawī training	Inherits Kubrā’s light-vision lineage.
Subtle centres / laṭāʾif	Inner organs of spiritual perception.
Colour stages	Diagnostic visionary map.
Prophetic correspondences	Each inner centre tied to a prophetic quality.
Critique of Ibn ʿArabī	Guardrail against metaphysical over-collapse.
Later influence	Naqshbandī and Persianate subtle-centre traditions.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — The Seven Subtle Centres

This is the core. Simnānī systematizes the inner body as layered perception.

Use for:

subtle anatomy
organs of vision
inner cartography
future chakra/latāʾif comparison
practice map
Cluster B — Colour as Diagnosis

Colour is not aesthetic mood. It marks transformation of the inner field.

Use for:

visionary colour atlas
art-tagging
dream/scrying classification
subtle-state recognition
anti-generic “lightwork”
Cluster C — Prophet Within

Simnānī’s subtle centres are associated with prophetic forms or presences.

Use for:

inner prophetology
prophetic psychology
human as layered revelation
Ibn ʿArabī bridge without collapse
Cluster D — Critique of Waḥdat al-Wujūd

This is the counterweight to Ibn ʿArabī/Qūnawī/Jīlī.

Use for:

metaphysical guardrails
avoiding pantheistic slop
distinction without separation
God/world asymmetry
Cluster E — From Kubrā to Simnānī

Kubrā gives light phenomena. Simnānī gives a more explicit anatomy of where those lights appear.

Use for:

lineage development
Kubrawī method
subtle-body refinement
continuity with source 7
6. Proposed essay sequence
Essay 1 — “The Subtle Body Is a Ladder of Perception”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Introduce Simnānī’s laṭāʾif as organs of perception, not vague energy centres.

Essay 2 — “Colour as Spiritual Diagnosis”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Build the colour-vision framework for Imaginarium’s art and dream layers.

Essay 3 — “The Prophet Within”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Explain prophetic correspondences as inner developmental presences.

Essay 4 — “Against Careless Unity”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Present Simnānī’s critique of Ibn ʿArabī as a needed metaphysical safeguard.

Essay 5 — “From Kubrā’s Lights to Simnānī’s Centres”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Show the transition from visionary light phenomenology to subtle-body system.

Essay 6 — “The Art Layer of the Laṭāʾif”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Use colours, prophetic correspondences, and inner organs for concept-to-image mapping.

7. Passage-pack targets
Pack	Source base	Use
Biography Pack	Iranica + Hurqalya	source identity
Laṭāʾif Pack	public summaries of seven subtle centres	subtle-body essay
Colour Pack	scholarship on Simnānī and colour	colour diagnosis essay
Prophet Pack	Kubrawī/Simnānī prophetic correspondences	prophet-within essay
Anti-Akbarian Pack	PhilPapers abstract + related studies	critique essay
Kubrā Bridge Pack	Kubrā source 7 + Simnānī	lineage essay
Art Pack	colour symbolism in Islamic art studies	visual layer essay
8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Subtle centres	5/5	Strongest next source after Kubrā.
Colour vision	5/5	Major Kubrawī development.
Prophetic inner anatomy	5/5	Unique Imaginarium value.
Critique of Ibn ʿArabī	5/5	Essential guardrail.
Practical discernment	4/5	Strong via colour/state mapping.
Divine-name metaphysics	2/5	Ibn ʿArabī/Qūnawī stronger.
Angelology	2/5	Not main mode.
Parable pedagogy	1/5	Rūmī/ʿAṭṭār stronger.
Public accessibility	3/5	Good summaries; full translations limited.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split colour from subtle centres.

Centres are organs. Colours are phenomena/signs.

Split

Split prophetic correspondences from Ibn ʿArabī critique.

One is inner anthropology. The other is metaphysical polemic.

Merge

Merge biography and lineage into a short architecture section, not a full essay.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

seven laṭāʾif
colour stages
prophet-within structure
Kubrawī inheritance
opposition to Ibn ʿArabī’s influence in Iran
critique of wujūd al-muṭlaq
courtly youth and renunciation
later Naqshbandī importance
10. Overlap warnings
With Kubrā

Overlap: lights, colour, visionary perception.
Difference: Kubrā is origin-phenomenology; Simnānī is more systematized subtle-body cartography.

With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: prophetic forms, unity, inner worlds.
Difference: Simnānī resists Akbarian identity-language and insists on stronger God/world distinction.

With Āmulī

Overlap: critique/reworking of Ibn ʿArabī.
Difference: Āmulī Shiʿizes Akbarianism; Simnānī challenges it from Kubrawī subtle-body discipline.

With Suhrawardī

Overlap: light, hierarchy, inner ascent.
Difference: Suhrawardī gives metaphysical light ontology; Simnānī gives colour-coded inner anatomy.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Full light ontology	Suhrawardī
Divine-name architecture	Ibn ʿArabī
Barzakh and dream body	Futūḥāt / Ṣadrā
Ecstatic beauty	Rūzbihān
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Parable field	Rūmī
Shiʿi walāya	Āmulī
12. Final recommended sequence
Source architecture map: Kubrawī subtle-body correction
The Subtle Body Is a Ladder of Perception
Colour as Spiritual Diagnosis
The Prophet Within
Against Careless Unity
From Kubrā’s Lights to Simnānī’s Centres
The Art Layer of the Laṭāʾif
Bridge note: Simnānī → Naqshbandī subtle-centre traditions
13. Final verdict

Simnānī is the right fifteenth source.

His core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The imaginal path must be anatomized. Visionary colours arise through subtle centres; each centre marks a stage of purification and a prophetic resonance; the inner body becomes a ladder of perception. At the same time, Simnānī warns against careless unity-language, giving the project a needed correction to over-Akbarian collapse.

Use this source as the project’s subtle-centre / colour-diagnosis / prophet-within / anti-careless-unity engine.

Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint
Source 16: ʿAbd al-Raḥmān Jāmī — Lawāʾiḥ / Flashes of Light
1. Source identity

Primary source: ʿAbd al-Raḥmān Jāmī, Lawāʾiḥ, usually translated as Flashes of Light or A Treatise on Sufism.

Best public-access base: E. H. Whinfield and Mīrzā Muḥammad Qazvīnī’s 1906 edition/translation is available on Internet Archive.

A public PDF is also hosted at Sufism.ir. Structure: The Smithsonian/Freer catalog describes Lawāʾiḥ as a mystical treatise in prose with numerous quatrains, divided into thirty sections or “flashes.” Lineage position: Public summaries connect Jāmī’s Lawāʾiḥ to Ibn ʿArabī’s metaphysics; Al-Islam notes that Jāmī wrote Lawāʾiḥ “in the same strain” as ʿIrāqī’s Lamaʿāt after Qūnawī’s lectures on the Fuṣūṣ.

Text type: compact Akbarian Sufi metaphysical prose-poetry; flashes of insight; short prose sections plus verse; synthetic teaching text.

Copyright caution: Whinfield/Qazvīnī 1906 is public-domain-safe. Modern reprints or PDFs may have added copyright claims; use the 1906 base for passage work.

2. Why this source comes sixteenth

After Simnānī’s subtle-centre and anti-careless-unity correction, Jāmī is the right next source because he gives a clean, compact, public-domain Akbarian synthesis.

His function:

Ibn ʿArabī’s ocean becomes thirty flashes: short metaphysical illuminations, each compressing unity, manifestation, love, poverty, selfhood, unveiling, and the Real into a prose-poem unit.

This is useful for Imaginarium because it is source-rich but manageable. It can become a modular essay/passage-pack engine.

3. Master structural reading

Read Lawāʾiḥ as thirty flashes of Akbarian gnosis.

Its movement is not narrative. It is not a path manual like Kubrā. It is not parable like Rūmī. It is a sequence of concentrated disclosures.

Core engine:

ordinary self sees multiplicity
metaphysical insight flashes
the Real is seen as source and substance of manifestation
love burns separative identity
poverty removes ownership
forms become mirrors
language alternates between doctrine and lyrical rupture
4. Part / section function map
Source unit	Function
Preface	States the treatise as “flashes” of insight for people of knowledge and ecstasy.
Early flashes	Establish tawḥīd, self/world illusion, Real vs appearance.
Middle flashes	Develop love, manifestation, mirror, poverty, unveiling.
Later flashes	Intensify annihilation, subsistence, non-possession, divine vision.
Quatrains	Turn doctrine into lyric compression.
Prose sections	Keep the metaphysical frame precise.
Thirty-flash structure	Ideal modular unit for passage packs and short essays.
5. Coverage clusters
Cluster A — Flash as Form

The “flash” is itself the method: brief illumination, not system.

Use for:

micro-essay format
source companion fragments
imaginal insight cards
sudden symbolic cognition
Cluster B — Unity and Manifestation

The central Akbarian cluster: the Real manifests through forms without becoming reducible to them.

Use for:

anti-flat nonduality
manifestation grammar
divine names bridge
Qūnawī/Jīlī continuation
Cluster C — Mirror Ontology

Jāmī repeatedly lends itself to mirror imagery: the Real appearing in forms, the heart as reflecting-place, the world as display.

Use for:

art layer
self/world reflection
heart as polished mirror
symbolic perception
Cluster D — Love as Metaphysical Fire

Love is not just emotion. It is the force that removes separateness and discloses the beloved through all forms.

Use for:

Rūmī bridge
Rūzbihān beauty bridge
desire transformed into gnosis
flame imagery
Cluster E — Poverty and Non-Ownership

Spiritual poverty strips possession of self, knowledge, virtue, and realization.

Use for:

anti-inflation
al-Niffarī bridge
fanāʾ without performance
humility
Cluster F — Prose + Quatrain Alternation

The form matters: doctrine is stated, then poetry breaks it open.

Use for:

essay architecture
citation strategy
passage-pack rhythm
“concept then image” format
6. Proposed long-form essay sequence
Essay 1 — “Thirty Flashes: Jāmī’s Form of Sudden Knowing”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Explain the flash-form as compact illumination.

Essay 2 — “The Real in the Mirror of Forms”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Core Akbarian manifestation essay.

Essay 3 — “Love Burns the Boundary”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Love as metaphysical fire, not sentiment.

Essay 4 — “Poverty: Owning Nothing, Not Even Gnosis”

Target: 3,500–4,500 words
Function: Anti-inflation essay, linking Jāmī to al-Niffarī.

Essay 5 — “Prose for Doctrine, Verse for Rupture”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Study the text’s alternating form.

Essay 6 — “Jāmī After Ibn ʿArabī”

Target: 4,000–5,000 words
Function: Position Lawāʾiḥ as a compact Akbarian teaching text.

Essay 7 — “From Shabistarī’s Garden to Jāmī’s Flashes”

Target: 3,000–4,000 words
Function: Compare symbolic compression modes.

7. Passage-pack targets

| Pack | Source location | Use |
|---|---|
| Preface Pack | opening description of Lawāʾiḥ | source identity |
| Flash Structure Pack | thirty-section architecture | form essay |
| Unity Pack | early flashes | tawḥīd / manifestation |
| Mirror Pack | middle flashes | heart/world/form reflection |
| Love Pack | love-centered flashes and quatrains | love-fire essay |
| Poverty Pack | poverty / non-ownership sections | anti-inflation essay |
| Form Pack | prose-quatrain alternation | style essay |
| Akbarian Bridge Pack | Ibn ʿArabī / Qūnawī / Jīlī context | lineage essay |

8. Coverage matrix
Theme	Strength	Notes
Compact Akbarian synthesis	5/5	Main value.
Unity / manifestation	5/5	Strong and accessible.
Love metaphysics	4/5	Strong bridge to Rūmī/Rūzbihān.
Mirror imagery	4/5	Excellent for Imaginarium.
Poetic compression	5/5	Very useful passage-pack form.
Practical wayfaring	2/5	Less direct than Kubrā.
Angelology	1/5	Not central.
Colour/subtle body	1/5	Simnānī/Kubrā stronger.
Apophatic address	2/5	al-Niffarī stronger.
Public accessibility	5/5	1906 public edition is available.
9. Editorial decisions
Split

Split unity/manifestation from love.

Unity is the metaphysical frame. Love is the transformative fire.

Split

Split poverty from annihilation.

Poverty is non-ownership; annihilation is identity-loss. Keep them linked but distinct.

Merge

Merge prose/poetry analysis into one form essay.

Preserve

Preserve concrete details:

thirty flashes
prose plus quatrains
Whinfield/Qazvīnī 1906 edition
“flashes of light”
mirror imagery
poverty
love
sudden insight
Akbarian lineage through Qūnawī/Fuṣūṣ
10. Overlap warnings
With Ibn ʿArabī

Overlap: unity, manifestation, divine names.
Difference: Ibn ʿArabī is vast and architectonic; Jāmī is compact, lyrical, and modular.

With Shabistarī

Overlap: compressed Sufi metaphysics.
Difference: Shabistarī uses symbolic garden/point/face imagery; Jāmī uses flash-form and prose-quatrain alternation.

With Rūmī

Overlap: love and poetic teaching.
Difference: Rūmī teaches through parable; Jāmī teaches through condensed metaphysical illumination.

With al-Niffarī

Overlap: poverty, non-possession, self-stripping.
Difference: al-Niffarī is divine address; Jāmī is reflective Akbarian prose-poetry.

11. Missing / weak coverage
Weak area	Better source
Angel-guide journey	Avicenna / Corbin
Light ontology	Suhrawardī
Bird-soul typology	ʿAṭṭār
Barzakh/dream body	Ibn ʿArabī Futūḥāt
First-person visionary diary	Rūzbihān
Dhikr/coloured lights	Kubrā
Apophatic address	al-Niffarī
Subtle centres	Simnānī
Shiʿi walāya	Āmulī
12. Final recommended sequence
Source architecture map: thirty flashes of Akbarian gnosis
Thirty Flashes: Jāmī’s Form of Sudden Knowing
The Real in the Mirror of Forms
Love Burns the Boundary
Poverty: Owning Nothing, Not Even Gnosis
Prose for Doctrine, Verse for Rupture
Jāmī After Ibn ʿArabī
From Shabistarī’s Garden to Jāmī’s Flashes
13. Final verdict

Jāmī’s Lawāʾiḥ is the correct sixteenth source.

Its core contribution to Imaginarium is:

The Akbarian world can be taught in flashes: short units where prose clarifies doctrine and quatrains rupture it into vision. Unity, manifestation, love, poverty, mirror, and annihilation become modular illuminations rather than a giant syste

# Coverage-First Source Companion Blueprint

## Source 17: Fakhr al-Dīn ʿIrāqī — *Lamaʿāt / Divine Flashes*

## 1. Source identity

**Primary source:** Fakhr al-Dīn ʿIrāqī, *Lamaʿāt*, translated as *Divine Flashes*.

**Why this is next:** after Jāmī’s *Lawāʾiḥ*, ʿIrāqī is the obvious companion source: Jāmī’s *Lawāʾiḥ* was written “in the same strain” as ʿIrāqī’s *Lamaʿāt*, and ʿIrāqī’s work itself emerges from the meeting of Persian love-mysticism with Qūnawī’s Akbarian reading of Ibn ʿArabī. ([Poetry Chaikhana][1])

**Public access / edition:** the best-known English translation is William Chittick and Peter Lamborn Wilson, *Fakhruddin Iraqi: Divine Flashes*, Paulist Press, 1982. It is copyrighted, so use sparingly. Google Books lists the edition, translators, publisher, date, and length. ([Google Books][2])

**Public-source situation:** no clean public-domain English translation is readily available. Public summaries and excerpts exist, but use them as support only. The Persian *Divan* is public-domain marked on Internet Archive, but it is not the same as a full public English *Lamaʿāt*. ([Internet Archive][3])

**Text type:** Persian Sufi love-metaphysics; mixed prose and poetry; Akbarian love ontology; “flash” literature.

**Extraction mode:** extensive summation, flash-by-flash architecture, short legally safe excerpts only.

---

# 2. Master structural reading

Read *Lamaʿāt* as **Ibn ʿArabī through the language of Love**.

Its core synthesis:

> Aḥmad Ghazālī gives the language of lover, beloved, and love.
> Qūnawī gives the Akbarian metaphysical skeleton.
> ʿIrāqī makes Love the name of the Real’s self-disclosure.

Public summaries state that *Lamaʿāt* combines Ibn ʿArabī’s philosophy with Persian love-mysticism, and that it was encouraged by Aḥmad Ghazālī’s *Sawāniḥ al-ʿUshshāq*. ([Wikipedia][4])

---

# 3. Part / function map

The work is usually described as **27 or 28 flashes**; one source notes that early texts suggest one chapter may have been divided, producing the 27/28 uncertainty. ([Wikipedia][4])

| Unit                    | Function                                                              |
| ----------------------- | --------------------------------------------------------------------- |
| Opening flashes         | Establish Love as primordial reality.                                 |
| Lover / Beloved flashes | Split of subject/object inside Love’s self-display.                   |
| Mirror flashes          | Forms as reflective surfaces of the One.                              |
| Veil flashes            | Manifestation both reveals and hides.                                 |
| Union flashes           | Lover and Beloved collapse without flattening difference.             |
| Poetry interludes       | Doctrine becomes intoxicated speech.                                  |
| Later flashes           | Love as annihilation, bewilderment, and total identity-in-difference. |

---

# 4. Coverage clusters

## Cluster A — Love as Ontology

Not emotion, not romance: Love is the metaphysical principle by which the Real manifests, seeks, and witnesses itself.

Use for:

* desire as cosmic engine
* manifestation through attraction
* love before lover/beloved
* Rūmī/Rūzbihān bridge

## Cluster B — Lover, Beloved, Love

This triad is the central diagram. The lover and beloved are not two separate entities first; they are polarizations within Love.

Use for:

* subject/object collapse
* relational metaphysics
* self/world mirror
* divine self-recognition

## Cluster C — Mirror and Image

Forms are mirrors. The beloved appears through images, but the image is neither merely false nor ultimate.

Use for:

* imaginal form
* art ontology
* “each image as disclosure”
* divine face through multiplicity

## Cluster D — Veiling and Unveiling

Love hides by showing and shows by hiding. The beloved’s very appearance can become the veil.

Use for:

* beauty as danger
* Rūzbihān correction
* al-Niffarī “vision as veil” bridge
* anti-image-inflation

## Cluster E — Wine, Fire, Burning

ʿIrāqī belongs to the ecstatic love tradition: love burns the lover’s separateness.

Use for:

* poetic fire
* annihilation
* intoxication
* self-loss

## Cluster F — Flash-Form

Like Jāmī’s *Lawāʾiḥ*, each flash is a compact metaphysical event.

Use for:

* short essay modules
* passage cards
* prose-poetry rhythm
* “doctrine → rupture” format

---

# 5. Proposed essay sequence

1. **Love Before Lover and Beloved** — 4,000–5,000 words
2. **The Threefold Diagram: Lover, Beloved, Love** — 4,000–5,000 words
3. **The Beloved in the Mirror of Forms** — 3,500–4,500 words
4. **Every Appearance Is Also a Veil** — 3,500–4,500 words
5. **Wine, Fire, and the Burning of Selfhood** — 3,000–4,000 words
6. **From Qūnawī’s Method to ʿIrāqī’s Love** — 3,500–4,500 words
7. **From ʿIrāqī’s Flashes to Jāmī’s Flashes** — 3,000–4,000 words

---

# 6. Passage-pack targets

| Pack | Source base | Use |
|---|---|
| Opening Love Pack | early flashes | Love ontology essay |
| Lover-Beloved Pack | triadic relation sections | relational metaphysics |
| Mirror Pack | public excerpts + Chittick/Wilson summary | image/form essay |
| Veil Pack | veiling/unveiling passages | anti-inflation essay |
| Fire/Wine Pack | poetry sections | ecstatic annihilation |
| Qūnawī Pack | Konya / Qūnawī context | lineage essay |
| Jāmī Pack | *Lawāʾiḥ* comparison | flash-form bridge |

---

# 7. Coverage matrix

| Theme                      | Strength | Notes                                                                  |
| -------------------------- | -------: | ---------------------------------------------------------------------- |
| Love metaphysics           |      5/5 | Core value.                                                            |
| Akbarian-Persian synthesis |      5/5 | Essential bridge source.                                               |
| Mirror/image ontology      |      4/5 | Strong for Imaginarium art layer.                                      |
| Prose-poetry flash form    |      5/5 | Direct companion to Jāmī.                                              |
| Divine beauty              |      4/5 | Strong, but Rūzbihān is more visionary.                                |
| Practical method           |      1/5 | Not a manual.                                                          |
| Angelology                 |      1/5 | Not central.                                                           |
| Colour/subtle body         |      1/5 | Kubrā/Simnānī stronger.                                                |
| Public accessibility       |      2/5 | English translation is copyrighted; use summaries/excerpts cautiously. |

---

# 8. Editorial decisions

**Split Love Ontology from Lover/Beloved.** Love is the absolute principle; lover/beloved is its relational display.

**Split Mirror from Veil.** The same image can disclose or trap.

**Merge wine/fire/burning into one annihilation essay.**

**Preserve strange details:** qalandar wandering, Multan, Baha al-Din Zakariyya, Konya, Qūnawī, 27/28 flashes, lover-beloved-love triad, mirror, veil, wine, burning, “no god but Love” motif.

---

# 9. Final recommended sequence

1. Source architecture map: 27/28 flashes of love-metaphysics
2. Love Before Lover and Beloved
3. The Threefold Diagram: Lover, Beloved, Love
4. The Beloved in the Mirror of Forms
5. Every Appearance Is Also a Veil
6. Wine, Fire, and the Burning of Selfhood
7. From Qūnawī’s Method to ʿIrāqī’s Love
8. From ʿIrāqī’s Flashes to Jāmī’s Flashes

---

# 10. Final verdict

ʿIrāqī’s *Lamaʿāt* is the correct seventeenth source.

Its core contribution to Imaginarium is:

**Love is not merely a feeling inside the seeker. Love is the Real’s own self-disclosing polarity: lover, beloved, mirror, veil, wine, fire, union, and annihilation are all flashes of one primordial Love seeing itself through forms.**

[1]: https://www.poetry-chaikhana.com/blog/2021/03/05/fakhruddin-iraqi-everywhere-veiled-2/?utm_source=chatgpt.com "Fakhruddin Iraqi – Everywhere veiled"
[2]: https://books.google.com/books/about/Divine_Flashes.html?id=sQWpysLH2_QC&utm_source=chatgpt.com "Divine Flashes - Fakhr al-Dīn Ibrāhīm ʻIrāqī"
[3]: https://archive.org/details/divan-e-fakhruddin-iraqi?utm_source=chatgpt.com "Divan e Fakhruddin Iraqi : Free Download, Borrow, and ..."
[4]: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fakhr_al-Din_Iraqi?utm_source=chatgpt.com "Fakhr al-Din Iraqi"
